<BODY DOCID=44>
McLean Industries Inc's United
States Lines Inc subsidiary said it has agreed in principle to
transfer its South American service by arranging for the
transfer of certain charters and assets to &lt;Crowley Mariotime
Corp>'s American Transport Lines Inc subsidiary.
    U.S. Lines said negotiations on the contract are expected
to be completed within the next week. Terms and conditions of
the contract would be subject to approval of various regulatory
bodies, including the U.S. Bankruptcy Court.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=49>
The Panama Canal Commission, a U.S.
government agency, said in its daily operations report that
there was a backlog of 39 ships waiting to enter the canal
early today. Over the next two days it expects --              
             2/26  2/27
                       Due: 27    35
      Scheduled to Transit: 35    41
           End-Day Backlog: 31    25
    Average waiting time tomorrow --
         Super Tankers  Regular Vessels
 North End:  13 hrs      15 hrs
 South End:   4 hrs      26 hrs
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=59>
Gulf barge freight rates firmed again on
the outlook for steady vessel loadings at the Gulf, increasing
the demand for barges to supply those ships, dealers said.
    No barges traded today on the St Louis Merchants' Exchange
call session, versus 29 yesterday.
    Quotes included -
 - Delivery this week on the Illinois River (Joliet) 135 pct of
tariff bid/140 offered, with next week same river (ex Chicago)
quoted the same - both up 2-1/2 percentage points.
 - Next week Mississippi River (St Louis) 120 pct bid/127-1/2
offered - up five points.
 - Next week Ohio River (Owensboro/south) 125 pct bid/132-1/2
offered - up 7-1/2 points.
 - On station Illinois River (south Chicago) 135 pct bid/140
offered - no comparison.
 - March Illinois (ex Chicago) 132-1/2 pct bid/140 offered - up
2-1/2 points.
 - March Ohio River bid at yesterday's traded level of 125 pct,
offered at 132-1/2.
 - March lower Mississippi River (Memphis/Cairo) 112-1/2 pct
bid/120 offered - no comparison.
 - May Illinois River (ex Chicago) 100 pct bid/107-1/2 offered
- no comparison.
 - Sept/Nov Lower Mississippi River (Memphis/Cairo) 137-1/2 pct
bid/145 offered, with Sept/Dec same section 125 pct bid/135
offered - no comparison.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=106>
There were seven grain ships loading and
six ships were waiting to load at Portland, according to the
Portland Merchants Exchange.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=281>
China has signed a 130 mln dlr loan
agreement with the World Bank to partly finance 12 new berths
with an annual capacity of 6.28 mln tonnes at the 20 mln tonne
a year capacity Tianjin port, the New China News Agency said.
    China will provide 370 mln yuan for the project and a
Chinese company won a bid against 12 other firms from seven
countries to do the foundation work, it said.
    It said 11 of the new berths will be able to handle ships
of more than 10,000 tonnes, three will handle containers and
the expansion will enable the port to handle coke, non-metal
mineral ores and mining equipment for the first time.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=368>
The port of Philadelphia was closed
when a Cypriot oil tanker, Seapride II, ran aground after
hitting a 200-foot tower supporting power lines across the
river, a Coast Guard spokesman said.
    He said there was no oil spill but the ship is lodged on
rocks opposite the Hope Creek nuclear power plant in New
Jersey.
    He said the port would be closed until today when they
hoped to refloat the ship on the high tide.
    After delivering oil to a refinery in Paulsboro, New
Jersey, the ship apparently lost its steering and hit the power
transmission line carrying power from the nuclear plant to the
state of Delaware.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=518>
Dutch port and transport union, FNV,
agreed to an employers' request to reconvene abandoned peace
talks tonight to try to end strikes that have disrupted
Rotterdam's general cargo sector for the past six weeks, a
union spokesman said.
    Talks broke down Thursday when the union walked out after
employers tabled their final offer to end the strikes which
started January 19 in protest at planned redundancies of 800
from the sector's 4,000 workforce, starting with 350 this year.
    The employers' invitation to restart the talks comes on the
day a deadline set by Minister of Social Affairs Louw de Graaf
for a resolution of the dispute expires.
    De Graaf said if the dispute had not ended by today he
would withdraw the 10 mln guilder annual labour subsidy to the
sector.
    No comment was immediately available from the employers'
organization.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=677>
Versatile Corp's shipbuilding subsidiary
has a letter of intent to build a 320 mln dlr polar icebreaker
for the Canadian coast guard, Transport Minister John Crosbie
said.
    In a Vancouver address, Crosbie said Versatile Pacific
Shipyards Inc was the low bidder to build the Arctic Class 8
icebreaker, but the company must meet certain financial and
engineering conditions before the contract is awarded.
    The government also announced it will provide up to 13 mln
dlrs in loan insurance to help Versatile prepare for the
construction of the vessel.
said before the contract can be awarded Versatile "will be
required to offer assurances that the shipyard is technically
and financially capable of performing the work."
    Crosibie said Versatile's bid was 100 mln dlrs lower than
competing bidders and will generate 1,000 person years of
direct employment.
    Work on the vessel, which Crosbie said would be the most
powerful icebreaker in the world, would begin next year and
completed in 1992.
    The government announced plans to build the icebreaker last
year following the controversial passage of the U.S. Coast
Guard's vessel, the Polar Sea, through the disputed Northwest
Passage. The U.S. government did not seek permission for the
journey, claiming the area was an international water way.
    The government said the icebreaker was needed to back up
the country's claim of sovereignty in the Arctic.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=857>
Canadian seafarers are almost certain
to go on strike this spring in a refusal to meet rollbacks in
wages and benefits asked for by their employers, Seafarers'
International Union official Roman Gralewicz said.
    "It's 99.9 percent--I guarantee you a strike," Gralewicz
said in an interview.
    The union represents about 2,300 workers on the Great Lakes
and Canada's East and West coasts. Contract talks broke off in
January and a conciliator has been appointed to try to help
settle the dispute. The current contract expires at the end of
March.
    The seafarers' employers are also asking for a reduction in
crew levels, a move which the union said would cost about 400
jobs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=969>
Employers and the port union, FNV, are
to meet again this afternoon to attempt a settlement of the
six-week-old dispute in Rotterdam's general cargo sector, but
neither side is optimistic, spokesmen for both sides told
Reuters.
    Little progress was made in last night's three hours of
talks, with both sides largely reiterating their positions.
    "There is still a very large gap between the employers and
the FNV, and I can't say that we expect to reach any agreement.
But at least we are still talking," a union spokesman said.
    Employers organization chairman, Jacques Schoufour, accused
the FNV of intransigence in refusing to alter its stance at all
over the past two months.
    "The FNV is not serious about our discussions and I am
really not optimistic about it changing its point of view at
all."
    "If we find this afternoon that the FNV still refuses to
accept the necessary redundancies in the general cargo sector,
then we will break off the talks and the redundancies may begin
later this month," Schoufour said.
    The series of strikes, which employers say has cost them
more than seven mln guilders in lost import business in the
past six weeks, began on January 19 in protest at plans for 800
redundancies from the sector's 4,000 workforce starting with
350 this year.
    Late last month Social Affairs minister Louw de Graaf said
unless the dispute was settled by yesterday he would withdraw
the sector's 10 mln guilder annual labour subsidy.
    Both sides wrote to the minister yesterday setting out
their cases, but Schoufour said he did not expect to hear from
him before Wednesday at the earliest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1052>
McLean Industries Inc said its
shipping subsidiary, United States Lines Inc, reached an
agreement in principle to transfer its South American service
to American Transport Lines Inc, a subsidiary of &lt;Crowley
Maritime Corp>.
    Under the terms of the agreement, United States Lines will
lease five vessels to American Transport for 15 months with an
option to extend the period up to 10 years, the company said.
    In return, U.S. Lines will receive a fixed payment and a
percentage of revenues for at least three years and possibly as
long as American Transport utilizes its vessels and conducts
trade in South America, the company said.
    The companies will consummate the transactions as soon as
the required approvals are obtained, McLean said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1257>
French exporters estimated that around
600,000 tonnes of French soft wheat has been sold to China for
delivery in the 1986/87 (July/June) year.
    Around 300,000 tonnes were exported to China between July
1986 and February this year.
    Another 100,000 to 150,000 tonnes will be shipped during
this month and around the same amount in April, they said.
    France sold around 250,000 tonnes of soft wheat to China in
1985/86, according to customs figures.
    However, certain exporters fear China may renounce part of
its contract with France after being offered one mln tonnes of
U.S. soft wheat under the Export Enhancement Program in January
and making some purchases under the initiative.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1556>
Worldwide spot crude oil movements fell
to 30.07 mln long dwt in February from 37.25 mln tons in
January and 41.44 mln in December, London shipbroker Howard
Houlder said.
    The decline mainly reflected a sharp drop in movements out
of the Mideast Gulf, which totalled 7.4 mln tons last month
against 11.65 mln in January. These included shipments to
western options at 2.05 mln tons against 3.59 mln previously.
    Liftings from the Gulf to eastern options fell to 4.15 mln
tons from 5.94 mln and those from the Gulf to other areas
dropped to 1.2 mln tons from 2.13 mln, Howard Houlder said.
    U.K./Continent coastal movements declined sharply to 2.91
mln tons from 4.77 mln but those from the U.K./Continent to the
U.S. rose to 1.99 mln from 1.69 mln.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1723>
Kenya has signed an agreement with
British and German interests to establish a shipping line that
will handle 40 pct of the country's external trade, sources
close to the deal said.
    The state-owned Kenya Ports Authority, KPA, signed an
agreement with the Hamburg-based shipping line Unimar
Seetransport to establish the Kenya National Shipping line,
with an initial capital of 100 mln shillings, sources said. KPA
will hold 70 pct of the shares in the new company.
    The line will initially charter vessels to operate services
between Mombasa and the main ports of industrial Europe, but
may eventually build or buy its own ships. The sources said it
would aim to carry a large part of Kenya's coffee and tea
exports and oil and fertiliser imports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1901>
Abnormally warm and dry weather over most
parts of China is seriously affecting crops, the New China News
Agency said.
    It said the drought has made rice planting difficult in
eight provinces, including Guangxi, Sichuan and Hunan. Plant
diseases and insect pests have increased in wheat-producing
areas, it said.
    The agency said some areas of Guangxi, Hubei, Shanxi and
other provinces have been suffering a drought for more than
seven months.
    The agency said the dry weather had reduced the amount of
water stored by more than 20 pct compared with last March,
lowered the water level of many rivers, reduced hydroelectric
power supplies and caused water shortages for industry and
consumers.
    The upper reaches of the Yangtze are at their lowest levels
in a century, causing many ships to run aground and making
harbour manoeuvres difficult, it said.
    The drought has also increased the number of forest fires.
More than 1,000 fires in southern China had destroyed 13,340
hectares of forest by mid-February, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1902>
Taiwan's state-owned China Shipbuilding
Corp (CSBC) plans to seek joint production agreements with
Japan and further diversify into ship repairing to try to trim
its debts, chairman Louis Lo said.
    He told Reuters in an interview that CSBC's first joint
production venture, to build two hulls for &lt;Onomichi Dockyard
Co Ltd>, was a success. Talks on similar projects have been
held with other Japanese firms, including Mitsubishi Heavy
Industries Co Ltd &lt;MITH.T> and Ishikawajima-Harima Heavy
Industries Co Ltd &lt;JIMA.T>, he said.
    Lo said CSBC delivered the hulls of two 2,200-TEU (twenty
foot equivalent unit) container ships this year to Onomichi,
which would complete production.
    "We expect the successful cooperation between us and
Onomichi will pave the way for further cooperation with other
Japanese shipbuilders in the future," Lo said.
    He said Japanese firms would gain from the lower cost of
shipbuilding in Taiwan while CSBC would benefit from Japanese
technology and marketing. This would pose a challenge to
competitors in Europe and South Korea.
    Lo said CSBC has made losses of about 100 mln U.S. Dlrs
since beginning operations in 1975. Its total debt now stands
at about 500 mln dlrs, with annual interest payments of nearly
three mln dlrs.
    But he said the company, which is Taiwan's largest
shipbuilder, still has full government support and had begun
diversifying into ship repairing and manufacture of pipes and
other machinery.
    "We hope we can survive and prosper through diversification,"
he said.
    Lo said income from ship repairing almost doubled to 20 mln
U.S. Dlrs in the year ended June 1986 compared with the
previous financial year. He estimated income would rise to more
than 25 mln dlrs in 1986/87.
    CSBC has orders to build 10 ships totalling 460,000 dead
weight tons (dwt) this financial year, compared with 11 ships
of 462,000 dwt in 1985/86, he said.
    Lo said the prospects for shipbuilding were gloomy at least
until 1991 due to overtonnage, but the outlook for ship
repairing was bright.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1904>
A group of creditor banks hopes to work
out a rescue package for Japan Line Ltd &lt;JLIT.T>, one of the
world's largest tanker operators, by the end of Japan's
business year on March 31, a spokesman for the Industrial Bank
of Japan Ltd &lt;IBJT.T> (IBJ) said.
    Japan Line's cumulative debt was 68.98 billion yen at the
end of September, which exceeded shareholders' equities and
reserves totalling 63.40 billion.
    In December, Japan Line asked banks to shelve repayment of
about 124 billion yen in outstanding loans and about 153
billion in loans to its subsidiaries.
    Japan Line said then that the yen's steep rise and the
world shipping recession had hit the company hard.
    The Japanese daily Asahi Shimbun said today that IBJ and
three other banks plan to abandon a total of 16 billion yen in
loans to Japan Line and a group of creditor banks plans to buy
seven billion yen of new Japan Line shares.
    The spokesman for IBJ, Japan Line's largest creditor, said
the package may write off part of the outstanding loans and
will be worked out before long.
    Commenting on the article, he said the details of the
package have not yet been settled.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1980>
Ice conditions are unchanged at the
Soviet Baltic oil port of Ventspils, with continuous and
compacted drift ice 15 to 30 cms thick, the latest report of
the Finnish Board of Navigation said.
    Icebreaker assistance to reach Ventspils harbour is needed
for normal steel vessels without special reinforcement against
ice, the report said.
    It gave no details of ice conditions at the other major
Soviet Baltic export harbour of Klaipeda.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10043>
World seaborne iron ore imports will
fall sharply by the year 2000 with declining imports to the EC
and Japan only partially offset by increased demand from South
East Asia, a report by Ocean Shipping Consultants said.
    The report predicts annual world seaborne iron ore imports
of 267.7 mln tonnes by 2000 versus 312.4 mln tonnes in 1985.
    It estimates that total bulk shipping demand from the iron
ore sector will fall by almost 10 pct, or 200 billion tonne
miles, with shipping demand associated with the coking trade
down about 17 pct or 130 billion tonne miles.
    The report sees EC imports falling to 91.7 mln tonnes in
2000 from 123.6 mln in 1985 with Japanese imports falling to 89
mln from 124.6 mln tonnes. Imports to South East Asia are seen
rising to 58.6 mln from 32.6 mln tonnes in 1985.
    It predicts that EC steel production will fall to 109 mln
tonnes in 2000 from 135.7 mln in 1985 with Japanese production
falling to 92 mln from 105.3 mln.
    South Korea and Taiwan are expected to double their output
to 40 mln tonnes with Chinese production increasing by 25 mln
tonnes to 80 mln, it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10302>
&lt;United States Lines Inc> has laid
off 260 employees, almost its entire Far East staff, its Hong
Kong office general manager Elliott Burnside told Reuters.
    He also said calls by two of its container ships to Busan,
South Korea and Kaohsiung, Taiwan, had been cancelled.
    He declined comment on local press reports that U.S. Lines
planned to suspend operations because of failure to restructure
its 1.27 billion U.S. Dlr debt, but said the firm would make an
announcement later today.
    U.S. Lines filed for protection from its creditors under
Chapter Eleven of the U.S. Federal law last November.
    The English-language South China Morning Post said U.S.
Lines decided yesterday to sell its two remaining transpacific
service fleets and assets and those of its U.S.-South America
operation.
    It quoted a letter by company's chief executive Charles
Hiltzheimer that said the ships and assets will be bought by
rival U.S. Shipping companies, subject to approval by their
boards.
    U.S. Lines' Far East operations comprise offices in Hong
Kong, Singapore, Manila, Busan, Seoul, Tokyo, Yokohama, Kobe
and Osaka, Burnside said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10388>
Very stormy weather is
likely in the North Sea through Saturday, disrupting shipping
in the region, private forecaster Accu-Weather Inc said.
    Rain will accompany the strong winds that are expected over
the North Sea today into tonight. Saturday will also be very
windy and cooler with frequent showers.
    Winds today will be southwest at 30 to 60 mph, but will
become west to northwest tonight and Saturday at 25 to 50 mph.
    Waves will build to 20 to 30 feet today and tonight and
continue Saturday. Wind and waves will not diminish until late
in the weekend.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10391>
A Liberian motor bulk carrier, the
72,203 dw tonnes Nikitas Roussos, which was grounded in the
Suez canal yesterday, has been refloated and is now proceeding
through the the canal, Lloyds Shipping Intelligence said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10394>
The tonnage of goods passing through
Ivory Coast's main port of Abidjan rose 2.3 pct last year,
according to the Ivorian Chamber of Commerce.
    Its monthly report said 9.47 mln tonnes of goods passed
through the port last year compared with 9.26 mln the year
before. Exports fell to 3.75 mln from 3.89 mln tonnes while
imports rose to 5.72 mln from 5.37 mln.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10395>
Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou
said today that the Greek armed froces were ready to tackle any
aggressors following the sailing of a Turkish research vessel
and warships towards disputed waters in the Aegean Sea.
    Papandreou told an emergency cabinet meeting in Athens "the
military readiness of our country is able now to give a very
hard lesson if our neighbours (Turkey) were to carry out
military actions."
    He said the activities of the research vessel could be
aimed at partitioning the Aegean.
    "The air force, navy and army are in a state of alert,"
General Guven Ergenc, Secretary General of the Turkish General
Staff, told a news conference.
    He said the Turkish research ship Sismik 1, escorted by an
unspecified number of warships, would sail into disputed waters
in the Aegean Sea tomorrow morning.
    Ergenc told Reuters later that all leave had been cancelled
for members of the armed forces in the Aegean coast area.
    The Turkish government said yesterday it had licensed the
state-owned Turkish Petroleum Corp to explore for oil in
international waters around three Greek islands off Turkey.
     Greece and Turkey have long-standing disputes over areas
of the Aegean and the presence of Turkish troops in Cyprus.
    The latest row erupted when the Greek government said last
month that it was taking control of a Canadian-led consortium
which was already producing oil off the Greek island of Thassos
and would drill in the same area after the takeover.
    Ergenc told the news conference the alert followed a
government decision that Turkey should protect its interests
"because of measures Greece has been taking in the Aegean in
violation of international agreements."
    Asked how Turkey would react if Greece attacked any of the
vessels, he said "If there is an attack, it is clear what has to
be done. An attack on a warship is a cause for war." But he
added "We are not in a state of war. The measures taken by the
military are directed towards protecting our rights."
    Greece said yesterday it would defend its national rights
in the Aegean and urged Turkey to accept reference of the
dispute to the International Court of Justice in The Hague.
    Turkish Foreign Ministry spokesman Yalim Eralp told
reporters today this was unacceptable because of preconditions
Athens had attached.
    In Athens, Greek Prime Minister Papandreou said that if the
Turkish vessel Sismik 1 began research operations "we will
hinder it, of course not with words, as it cannot be stopped
with words."
    Greek newspapers said the armed forces were on alert and
navy ships had gone to the Aegean. But government spokesman
Yannis Roubatis did not confirm the move, saying only "The Greek
fleet is not at its naval base."
    Papandreou said that a map issued in Turkey showed 95 pct
of the areas proposed for research were on the Greek
continental shelf.
    Papandreou told the U.S. And NATO that if they had a part
in orchestrating the present crisis in order to force Greece to
negotiate with Turkey, the Greek government would not accept
it.
    Papandreou has maintained in the past that he will not
negotiate with Ankara until Turkey recognises Greek rights in
the Aegean and withdraws its troops from Cyprus.
    He said that in the case of war with Turkey it would not be
possible for Greece to discuss the future of American military
bases here. Asked by reporters if he would close the U.S. Bases
in Greece in the event of war, Papandreou replied "Obviously,
and perhaps even before the war."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10452>
NATO ambassadors met in emergency
session today to discuss tension between members Greece and
Turkey over a disputed area of the Aegean Sea on the Western
Alliance's southern flank, Greek diplomatic sources said.
    They said no information had yet emerged from the meeting,
called after statements from both countries that they were
prepared to back rival oil exploration teams with warships.
    General Guven Ergenc, Secretary General of the Turkish
General Staff, said today the Turkish research ship Sismik 1,
escorted by an unspecified number of warships, would sail into
disputed waters in the Aegean Sea tomorrow morning.
    Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou said "The military
readiness of our country is able now to give a very hard lesson
if our neighbours (Turkey) were to carry out military actions."
    The row erupted when the Greek government said last month
that it was taking control of a Canadian-led consortium which
was already producing oil off the Greek island of Thassos and
would drill in the same area after the takeover.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10539>
Greece and Turkey's NATO allies today
called on both countries to avoid any action that could
aggravate an explosive situation in the Aegean and "avoid
recourse to force at all costs."
    After an emergency meeting of NATO ambassadors, a statement
was issued saying "the present situation damages the interests
of Greece and Turkey, and of the Alliance as a whole."
    Secretary-General Lord Carrington also offered himself as a
mediator in the dispute on the Western Alliance's southern
flank.
    The meeting was called after reports that warships of both
countries were sailing towards a disputed oil exploration zone
of the Aegean.
    The statement said the tensions in the area had reached a
serious level and called on both countries to begin immediate
discussions. "Any intensification would make things worse," it
added.
    No attempt was made at the meeting to resolve the complex
dispute which was aimed at damage-limitation. Carrington said,
"I am of course anxious to help in any way I can, provided that
both Greece and Turkey, and the other allies, wish me to do so."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10559>
The Baltic International Freight Futures
Exchange (BIFFEX) said it agreed to pursue negotiations with
other futures markets on the Baltic Exchange with a view to
merging into a new futures exchange.
    Legal advisers have already been instructed to implement
amalgamation of the London Potato Futures Association, the Soya
Bean Meal Futures Exchange and the London Meat Futures
Exchange.
    The London Grain Futures Market has also discussed merging
with the other markets.
    The aim of the merger is to seek Recognised Investment
Exchange status as required by the 1986 Financial Services Act.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10582>
McLean Industries Inc said its
two shipping subsidiaries -- UNITED States Lines Inc and United
States Lines (S.A.) Inc -- have agreed in principle to dispose
of substantially all their remaining operating shipping assets.
    The units have been operating under protection of Chapter
11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code since last November.
    McLean said U.S. Lines has a letter of intent with CSX
Corp's &lt;CSX> Sea-Land Corp subsidiary to transfer assets of its
Transpacific/Hawaii/Guam Service to Sea-Land.
    McLean said Sea-Land has tentatively agreed to pay 125 mln
dlrs for six vessels, certain port facilities, and various
other equipment used in U.S. Lines' Transpacific service and
theree Lancer class vessels and subsidy rights owned by the two
McLean subsidiaries.
    As previously announced, U.S. Lines (S.A.) will transfer
its South American Service to &lt;Crowley Maritime Corp>'s
American Transport Lines Inc subsidiary in return for a fixed
lease payment for the four Lancer class vessels and a
participation based on American Transport's South American
revenues.
    McLean said the agreement also calls for Crowley to release
U.S. Lines (S.A.) for any damages and unpaid charter hire for
three vessels leased to U.S. Lines (S.A.) by Crowley which have
been returned to Crowley.
    McLean said the minimum lease payments will be seven mln
dlrs and estimated revenue participation during the first four
years at about 16 mln dlrs. In addition, U.S. Lines (S.A.)
subsidiaries in Brazil and Argentina will be sold to American
Transport.
    The company said both agreements in principle have been
approved by directors of the companies involved, but still need
court, regulatory and lender approval.
    McLean said it is requesting the bankruptcy court to
schedule a hearing on its motion to approve the agreements,
adding that the court has granted the company's request to
extend for 90 days the period for the shipping companies to
file a proposed plan of reorganization.
    It said the planned transactions will leave McLean with no
significant shipping assets except 12 New York class vessels,
which are not in operation and are expected to be sold.
    McLean said its shipping units are returning the vessels
operating in foreign commerce to United States ports to permit
the planned transfer to purchasers.
    The company said U.S. Lines will maintain its weekly
service from the U.S. West Coast to Hawaii and Guam until the
vessels are transferred and the transaction is completed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10588>
The United States said it was doing
what it could to ease tension in the Aegean as Greek and
Turkish warships headed for a possible clash over oil drilling
rights on the sea's continental shelf.
    State Department spokesman Charles Redman told reporters,
"We have urged both sides to exercise restraint and avoid any
actions which might exacerbate the situation."
    "In the light of the most recent developments, we are
consulting with the parties and with other interested allies on
means to reduce tensions," he added.
    Redman declined to elaborate on what Washington was doing,
but he said an emergency meeting of NATO ambassadors in
Brussels on the subject was only one path it was pursuing.
    He also refused to say which side was to blame for the
renewed confrontation, saying Washington was still trying to
ascertain all the facts, as Prime minister Andreas Papanderou
said Greece was prepared to tackle any aggressor.
    "The crucial point here is that these are two friends and
allies. We don't want to see tension rise and we are doing what
we can to see if we can help here," Redman said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10620>
A Turkish research ship, escorted by
warships and air force planes, left for the Aegean to press
Ankara's case in an escalating row with Greece over oil rights,
the semi-official Anatolian News Agency said.
    The ship set off this morning from the Dardanelles port of
Canakkale with flags flying and watched by sightseers, the
agency said.
    Prime Minister Turgut Ozal said last night the ship would
not go into international waters unless Greece did the same.
    "We are waiting for the first move from them," he told
Turkish Radio in London.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10621>
Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou
expressed "restricted optimism" about a crisis with Turkey over
disputed oil rights in the Aegean Sea.
    Papandreou was speaking to reporters after briefing
opposition political leaders on the latest developments in the
row as a Turkish research ship escorted by warships and combat
aircraft headed for the Aegean.
    He and other political leaders spoke of qualified optimism
following a statement by Turkish Premier Turgut Ozal last night
that the research vessel would not enter disputed waters as
previously annnounced unless Greek vessels did so.
    The Prime Minister declined to answer reporters' questions
about an announcement last night that Greece had asked the
United States to suspend operations at one of the American
military bases here due to the crisis.
    But Opposition leader Constantine Mitsotakis told reporters
he thought the suspension would be temporary until the crisis
is resolved. A U.S. Defence Department official in Washington
said the station was still functioning.
    Communist Party leader Harilaos Florakis said here "the
climate is calmer today."
    Greek newspapers reported that the Greek army, navy and air
force had been moved to strategic Greek islands in the Aegean
and to the land border with Turkey at the Evros River.
    But there was no official word on military movements apart
from a comment by the government spokesman that the Greek navy
was no longer in port.
    The United States, NATO and the United Nations all called
on Greece and Turkey to exercise restraint.
    Greek U.N. Representative Mihalis Dounas said in a letter
to the secretary-general that the dispute was of a legal nature
and could be settled in the International Court in the Hague.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10627>
Turkey"s standoff with Greece over Aegean
oil rights appeared at an end after the government said it had
been assured Athens would not start prospecting in disputed
waters.
    A Foreign Ministry statement last night hinted Turkey was
claiming victory. A Greek-based international consortium, North
Aegean Petroleum Co., Had given up plans to start searching for
oil in international waters east of Thasos island, it said.
    "In the same way it has been understood that Greece will
also not undertake oil activities outside its territorial
waters," the statement added.
    An Ankara Radio report monitored in London said Foreign
Minister Vahit Halefolu had called on Greece to engage in
dialogue over the dispute. It was impossible to resolve the
dispute by crises, he was quoted as saying.
    "We call on Greece to come and engage in a dialogue with us
- let us find a solution as two neighbours and allies should,"
he said.
    The radio said Halefoglu had briefed the leaders of a
number of the country"s political parties on the latest
developments.
    Turkey sent the survey ship Sismik 1 into the Aegean
yesterday, flanked by warships, to press its case but having
earlier said it would go into disputed waters, declared the
vessel would stay in Turkish areas.
    Prime Minister Turgut Ozal, in London on his way home after
heart surgery in the United States, is expected to receive an
ecstatic welcome from thousands of Turks when he returns today.
    He was in defiant mood last night, telling Turkish radio:
"We can never accept that Greece should confine us to the
Anatolian continent. If there are riches under the sea, they
are for mankind."
    Despite the end of the crisis, Turkish officials
acknowledged that the underlying dispute over delimiting the
continental shelf in the Aegean remained unsolved.
    Turkey alleged that the consortium"s plans would have
infringed the 1976 Berne agreement between the two countries,
which called for a moratorium on any activities until the
delimitation was agreed. Greece earlier this month declared it
considers the accord inoperative.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10641>
Turkey pulled warships back from close
escort of its Sismik 1 survey ship as the threat of conflict
with Greece over oil rights in the Aegean Sea abated.
    The semi-official Anatolian Agency said naval vessels ended
their close protection of the ship as it continued work in
Turkish waters but were following it at a distance.
    Popular newspapers headlined what they saw as Turkish
resolve and international pressure forcing Greece to pull back
from planned exploration in disputed international waters.
    "Intense United States and NATO efforts bore fruit: Greece
will stay in its national waters," said the daily Gunes. The
top-selling Hurriyet topped its front page with: "Our resolute
stand made Greece see reason."
    But two newspapers, Cumhuriyet and Milliyet, noted in
identical headlines -- "Crisis Frozen" -- that the basic
disagreement over exploration rights remained unsolved.
    The confrontation eased after the Turkish government said
it had been assured Athens would not begin prospecting in
disputed waters.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10717>
Japan's ailing shipyards have won
approval from the Fair Trade Commission to form a cartel to
slash production to about half of total capacity for one year,
effective April 1, industry sources said.
    The approval follows an act of parliament passed last week
designed to help the industry regroup and shed 20 pct of
capacity by March 31, 1988, Transport Ministry officials said.
    The cartel, comprising 33 yards capable of constructing
ships of more than 10,000 gross tonnes, will limit newbuilding
output to a maximum of three mln compensated gross registered
tonnes in 1987/88, the Shipbuilders Association of Japan said.
    Industry sources said the 33 will seek to renew the cartel
in 1988/89 in the belief demand will remain sluggish.
    Last week's temporary act of parliament also allows
shipbuilders to receive favourable taxation terms plus up to 50
billion yen in compensation for liabilities incurred through
job losses and the sale of excess capacity.
    Up to 30 billion yen has been allocated for purchasing
redundant land and equipment from shipbuilders.
    The Ministry will start drawing up its restructuring
guidelines from April 1 and the yards will implement the
guidelines from September, industry sources said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10748>
British and Commonwealth Shipping Co Plc
&lt;BCOM.L> said that it would reorganise its commercial and
service operations into a single public grouping with
autonomous management.
    The group has expanded rapidly in the past year through the
672.5 mln stg acquisition of &lt;Exco International Plc> and 90
mln bid for &lt;Steel Brothers Holdings Plc>.
    It noted that its operations were now divided between
financial services, including money broking, investment
management and forfaiting, and more traditional areas such as
aviation, hotels, commodity trading and office equipment.
    It said that each sector had exciting prospects but
required different methods of management and financing.
    B and C planned to form a new public company to hold the
commercial operations and envisaged it operating with a capital
of between 400 mln and 600 mln stg.
    It has retained Barclays de Zoete Wedd to advise on the
introduction of independent investors to subscribe for
additional capital, and believes that the proportion of equity
capital held by outside investors would not exceed 20 pct of
the total.
    The statement said that with the continued support of B and
C, together with outside capital, the new grouping would emerge
as a major group in its own right with the ability to take
advantages of opportunities as they arose. However, the group
would not seek a listing for the time being.
    B and C also said that its chairman, Lord Cayzer, planned
to retire in June. The company proposed that he be appointed
life president and that current chief executive John Gunn
should take over as chairman.
    B and C shares eased 11p to 459p at 1040 GMT.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10797>
Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou has
withdrawn a request to Washington to suspend operations at an
American army base near Athens as a Greek-Turkish row over oil
rights in the Aegean eased.
    A Turkish research ship which Greece had threatened to
tackle if it sailed into disputed waters in the Aegean Sea kept
to Turkish territorial waters yesterday, avoiding a potential
clash.
    Papandreou expressed qualified optimism after briefing
opposition leaders on Aegean developments early yesterday.
    The Greek government later withdrew Friday's request to
Washington to close down its telecommunications base at Nea
Makri, north of Athens, saying that the reasons which had
prompted it to make the request were no longer valid.
    Under the terms of the U.S.-Greek bases accord, Greece has
the right to ask for suspension of operations at times when its
national interests are threatened.
    The row in the Aegean erupted after Turkey said it would
search for oil round three Greek islands off its coast
following an announcement from Greece that it planned to drill
east of Thassos island after taking control of a Canadian-led
oil consortium operating in the northern Aegean.
    Turkey accused Greece of breaching the 1976 Berne Agreement
under which both sides agreed to preserve the status quo in the
Aegean until their continental shelf dispute was settled.
Athens says it considers the accord inactive.
    The Turkish Foreign Ministry said in a statement it had
received an assurance from Greece that it would not carry out
oil activities outside its territorial waters. Greece declined
comment on the statement.
    Papandreou repeated an invitation to Turkey to take the
long-standing continental shelf dispute to the International
Court of Justice at The Hague.
    Conservative opposition leader Constantine Mitsotakis said
he had urged Papandreou to accept an offer from NATO General
Secretary Lord Carrington to help resolve the row.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10803>
The Panamanian motor vessel Northern 1,
4,217 dwt, was safely towed into Greenock over the weekend
after having its crankshaft broken off the Scottish coast
during severe weather, Lloyds Shipping Intelligence said.
    Northern 1 was loaded with 3,000 tons of sugar from
Demerara.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11251>
&lt;Hapag Lloyd AG> said it ordered a new
container vessel from China for its Australia service.
    The order was given to the &lt;Hudong shipyards> in Shanghai
after lengthy negotiations with West German shipbuilders, the
company said in a statement.
    The Chinese firm offered to build the vessel at over 30 mln
marks less than West German yards, despite government subsidies
which Bonn pays its ailing shipbuilding industry, Hapag said. A
company spokesman would not comment on the total order value
but said the new vessel would replace the 33,333 dwt Sydney
Express in 1989 and would carry 2,700 container units.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11271>
The Cabinet approved a plan for the
Port Authority of Thailand to buy six gantry cranes from
Metalna Co of Yugoslavia for about 13.4 mln dlrs, a government
spokesman said.
    He said Thailand will pay for 25 pct of the cost of the
cranes in U.S. Dlrs and the rest by sales of rice, textiles and
other commodities to Yugoslavia.
    The Bangkok Shipowners and Agents Association has appealed
to the government to scrap the purchase plan. It said it would
be an unnecessary expense as most vessels calling at the port
already have their own cargo handling equipment.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11385>
The St Lawrence Seaway said the first
ship of the season passed through the St Lambert lock here this
morning, officially opening the 2,300-mile-long waterway's 1987
shipping season.
    The seaway has said it expects little increase in freight
levels this year from last year when it moved 37.6 mln tonnes
of freight between Montreal and Lake Ontario and 41.6 mln
tonnes on the Welland Canal, which links Lake Erie and Lake
Ontario. The canal is scheduled to open tomorrow.
    Officials expect the waterway to lose nine to ten mln
Canadian dlrs this year, about the same as the estimated
deficit for fiscal 1986-87, which ends today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11587>
The U.S. Agriculture Department said
it will begin charging interest tomorrow on the over 12 mln
dlrs the Department of Transportation, DOT, owes USDA to pay
for its share of the cost of shipping food aid on U.S. vessels.
    USDA General Sales Manager Melvin Sims told the Senate
Appropriations Agriculture Subcommittee his department had
billed DOT 12 mln dlrs, and that interest on that amount and an
additional charge would begin accruing April 1.
    USDA's Foreign Agricultural Service Administrator Thomas
Kay told Reuters DOT could owe USDA as much as 20 mln dlrs.
    The two departments are trying to hammer out an accord on
how to fund the increasing share of food aid required to be
shipped on U.S. flag vessels under a 1985 farm bill provision
on cargo preference.
    Sims said the agencies were near to reaching a memorandum
of understanding governing how DOT would pay for its share of
the cargo preference costs.
    Under the 1985 bill, the percentage of food aid shipments
carried on U.S. vessels was to increase gradually over three
years to 75 pct in 1988 from 50 pct.
    Although the increased cost was to be funded by DOT, Sims
said that department to date has contributed no money.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11694>
Honduras will tender April 2 for
U.S. and non-U.S. flag vessels to import 19,369 tonnes of wheat
in bulk, an agent for the country said.
    The agent said Honduras is seeking vessels to deliver 
7,369 tonnes during a period that includes laydays of April
15-30, and 12,000 tonnes with laydays of May 15-30.
    Offers are due no later than 1200 hrs EST, April 2, and
will remain valid through the close of business the following
day, the agent said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11813>
Taiwan's shipbreaking industry is
expected to decline sharply this year despite the boom in 1986
because of keener competition from South Korea and China, the
rising Taiwan dollar and U.S. Import curbs on steel products,
industry sources said.
    Last year, Taiwanese breakers demolished a record 344
vessels totalling 3.69 million light displacement tons (ldt),
up on 165 of 2.97 million ldt in 1985, Lin Chung-jung, a Taiwan
Shipbreaking Industry Association (TSIA) spokesman, told
Reuters.
    China scrapped vessels of some 1.1 mln ldt last year while
South Korea demolished ships of 910,000 ldt, he said.
    Yao Liu, president of Chi Shun Hwa Steel Co, a leading
shipbreaker and steel producer in Kaohsiung, told Reuters, "We
expect to scrap fewer ships this year because of an expected
decline in our steel product exports."
    Lin said many breakers predicted a 20 pct decline in
scrapping operations this year due to falling demand from the
U.S., Japan and Southeast Asia for Taiwanese steel.
    Taiwan agreed last year to voluntarily limit its steel
product exports to the U.S. To 120,000 tonnes in the first half
of 1987 from about 260,000 tonnes in the first half of 1986, a
Taiwan Steel and Iron Association official said.
    Yao said the rising Taiwan dollar means Taiwan's steel
exports are more expensive than South Korea's and China's.
    The Taiwan dollar has strengthened by some 16 pct against
the U.S. Unit since September 1985 and some bankers and
economists said it could appreciate to 32 to the U.S. Dollar by
the end of the year from 34.23 today, Yao said.
    In comparison, the won rose by about five pct and yuan
remained stable during the same period, he added.
    "We have lost some orders to South Korea and mainland China
because foreign importers have switched their purchases," he
said.
    Taiwan's steel exports to the U.S., Japan and Southeast
Asia slipped to 148,000 tonnes in the first two months of 1987
from about 220,000 tonnes a year earlier, the Taiwan Steel and
Iron Association official said.
    He said he expected further declines in later months but
did not give figures.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11840>
Lightning strikes hit the grain sector
of the port of Rotterdam today after employers turned down
union demands for shorter working hours in a new labour
agreement, transport union FNV spokesman Bert Duim said.
    Around 140 grain handlers stopped work, 125 of them at the
two Europoort locations of Graan Elevator Mij (GEM), which
handles about 95 pct of grain, oilseeds and derivatives passing
through Rotterdam.
    GEM managing director Pieter van der Vorm said the
facilities were 40 pct operational.
    The employers had invited the unions for talks later today,
but details of the labour agreement would not be on the agenda,
Van der Vorm said.
    It is barely one month since the end of an eight-week
campaign of lightning strikes against redundancies in
Rotterdam's general cargo sector, which stevedoring companies
said cost them millions of guilders.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11885>
French cereals exports through Rouen port
rose to 751,563 tonnes between March 1 and March 25 from
603,413 tonnes in the same 1986 period, freight sources said.
    The Soviet Union took 263,051 tonnes of wheat and barley,
Saudi Arabia 90,944 tonnes barley, China 87,259 wheat, Algeria
64,896 wheat, Bangladesh 30,000 wheat, Morocco 27,500 maize,
Greece 26,700 wheat and barley, Spain 25,124 wheat, Poland
24,683 wheat, Brazil 24,082 wheat, Italy 21,659 wheat, Cyprus
20,700 wheat and maize, Israel 16,500 maize and the U.K. 8,797
tonnes wheat.
    Six ships are loading 120,000 tonnes of wheat, the sources
said. They include 30,000 tonnes for China, 31,000 for the
Soviet Union, 25,000 for Turkey, and 35,000 for Italy. Another
ship is loading 17,000 tonnes of colza for the Soviet Union.
    Another 12 ships should arrive to load 344,000 tonnes of
cereals by the end of the week. Six are to load 186,000 tonnes
of wheat for the Soviet Union. Two will load 60,000 tonnes of
barley for Saudi Arabia, one 28,000 tonnes of wheat for China,
two 25,000 tonnes of wheat each for Algeria and Turkey and one
20,000 tonnes of wheat for Italy. Another is expected to load
20,000 tonnes of colza for the Soviet Union.
    Flour exports through Rouen rose to 23,457 tonnes in the 25
day period from 5,500 in the equivalent 1986 period, the
sources said.
    Sudan took 19,327 tonnes and west coast Africa 4,130.
    Four ships are currently loading 32,000 tonnes, including
24,000 for Egypt, 6,000 for Tanzania and 2,000 for Mauritania.
    A ship is expected later this week to load 12,000 tonnes
for China.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11911>
One grain vessel was awaiting berth
at Bahia Blanca, four at Buenos Aires and five at Rosario, on
March 31, National Grain Board figures show.
    The situation at these ports was as follows, giving the
number of ships loading, awaiting berth and expected
respectively.
    Bahia Blanca - 4, 1, 1
    Buenos Aires - 1, 4, 9
    Rosario -      6, 5, 7
    The tonnage of grain and oilseeds to be loaded onto ships
loading, awaiting berth and expected at each port was as
follows.
    Bahia Blanca - Wheat 161,360.
    Buenos Aires - Maize 104,304, Wheat 14,330.
    Rosario - Wheat 50,400, maize 157,040, subproducts 50,100,
sunflowerseed 1,000 and millet 3,100.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12081>
Ten grain ships were loading and 18
were waiting to load at New Orleans elevators, trade sources
said.
 ELEVATOR                     LOADING  WAITING
 Continental Grain, Westwego     1      3
 Mississippi River, Myrtle Grove 2      0
 ADM Growmark                    1      4
 Bunge Grain, Destrehan          1      0
    ELEVATOR                LOADING  WAITING
 ST CHARLES DESTREHAN         1      3
 RESERVE ELEVATOR CORP        0      1
 PEAVEY CO, ST ELMO           1      2
 CARGILL GRAIN, TERRE HAUTE   1      4
 CARGILL GRAIN, PORT ALLEN    1      0
 ZEN-NOH                      1      1
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12161>
Rio Grande/Azores and Leixoes 26,000 mt
hss 14 dlrs basis one to two 4,000/1,500 Azores and 3,500
Leixoes 25/4-5/5.
    Paranagua/one-two ports Spanish Med 35,000 mt hss 11.50
dlrs basis one to one 10 days all purposes 20-30/4.
    USG/Taiwan 54,000 mt hss 10,000 shex/4,000 shex 20/4-5/5.
    USG/ARA-Ghent option Seaforth 40,000/45,000 long tons hss
10 days all purposes 9-15/4 try later.
    Dieppe/one-two ports Italian Adriatic 9,500/11,000 mt bulk
wheat 3,000/2,000 6-12/4.
    St Lawrence/one-three ports Marseilles-Manfredonia range
20,000/35,000 mt bulk wheat 5,000/222,500 10-15/4.
    Chimbote/Kaohsiung 9,500 mt bulk/bagged fishmeal 250 ph/200
ph 20/4-5/5.
    Immingham or Foynes/Red Sea 25,000 mt bulk barley
4,000/3,000 10-15/4 alternatively try t/c.
    USG/Maracaibo 10,000 mt wheat (three grades) three
days/1,000 1-15/4.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12162>
Rotterdam/Karachi
20,000/21,000 mt shredded scrap 7,000/1,100 15-30/4.
    Bin Qasim/Shanghai 25,000 mt pig iron 1,500 fhex/1,200 shex
1-10/4.
    Chungjin/Manila 4,200 mt steel coils 800/liner discharge
23-30/4.
    Bilbao/one port Vietnam 5,000 mt steels fio 1,000/500 end
April
    Singapore/Mizushima 6,000/10,000 mt steel scrap fiot
1,200/3,00 2-12/4.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12164>
South Africa/Salvador, Brazil
15,000 long tons manganese ore 2,500/1,500 end April.
    Callao/Crotone 5,000 mt minerals 4,000/2,000 spot.
    Geraldton/Tampico 13,500 mt bulk mineral sands fio
10,000/2,000 1-10/5.
    Itea/Dunkirk 20,000 mt bauxite seven days all purposes
10-13/4.
    Tampico/North Spain 15,000 mt ore two days shinc/3,000 shex
5-25/4.
    One port German North Sea/USG 10,500 mt bulk ore
2,500/4,000 7-13/4.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12174>
Delfzyl/India 14,700 mt
bagged sugar about 30 dlrs 750/1,000 ppt a/c Benham.
    Antwerp/Lagos 12,000 mt bagged sugar 750/750 try liner
discharge 5-20/4 a/c E D and F Man.
    T/C single or tweendecker 16,000/19,000 tonnes dw del
Queensland mid-April/early-May for trip with bulk sugar redel
China duration about 30 to 40 days a/c Kawasaki.
    One port A-H range/Dubai 6,800 mt bagged sugar 750/750
10-15/4 a/c unnamed charterer.
    enquiries - Rouen-Hamburg/India 14,000 mt bagged sugar
750/1,000 15-25/4 a/c Woodhouse, Drake and Carey.
    Flushing/Hodeidah and Mokha 16,800 mt bagged sugar 750/750
9-15/4 Genoc.
    Santos/Hodeidah 10,000 mt bagged sugar about 30 dlrs
750/750 20-30/4 a/c Dutch charterer.
    Cargill is reported to have withdrawn its enquiries for
cargoes from South Korea to India, from Constanza to India and
from Buenaventura to the U.S.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12179>
The Panama Canal Commission, a U.S.
government agency, said in its daily operations report that
there was a backlog of 41 ships waiting to enter the canal
early today. Over the next two days it expects --              
             4/01  4/02
                       Due: 34    34
      Scheduled to Transit: 41    39
           End-Day Backlog: 34    29

    Average waiting time tomorrow --
         Super Tankers  Regular Vessels
 North End:  25 hrs      11 hrs
 South End:  24 hrs      31 hrs
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12249>
Gulf barge freight rates continued to
show a firmer tone in the nearbys on the assumption that
changes in the Gulf posted prices will encourage increases in
both PIK-and-roll activity and barges shipments, with a total
of 21 barges traded this morning on the ST Louis Merchants'
Exchange call session, versus nine yesterday, dealers said.
    Quotes included -
 - This week Mississippi River (Granite City, MLA if P/O)
traded at 175 pct of tariff, five percentage points above
yesterday's bid.
 - Next week Mississippi (Alton/Granite City, MLA if P/O) bid
five points higher at 175 pct, offered at 190.
 - Five barges each week April MidMississippi River
(Dubuque/south) traded at yesterday's bid of 170 pct.
 - April Illinois River (ex Chicago) 160 pct bid, offered 10
points higher at 170.
 - May same section 140 pct bid, offered five lower at 145.
 - May MidMississippi River (Dubuque/south) bid 2-1/2 points
higher at 142-1/2 pct, offered at 145.
 - June/July lower Mississippi River (Memphis/Cairo) offered at
120 pct, no bids.
 - June/Aug upper Mississippi River (Lacrosse/Savage) offered
at 150 pct, no bids.
 - Oct/Nov MidMississippi (Dubuque/south, L/H Nov
Clinton/south) 170 pct bid/177-1/2 offered - no comparison.
 - December Illinois River (ex Chicago) 122-1/2 pct bid/127-1/2
offered - down 2-1/2 points on offer.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12270>
Seven tugs will attempt to refloat the
South Korean motor bulk carrier Hyundai New World tonight,
Lloyds shipping intelligence service said in its latest update.
    The vessel grounded close to Itaqui port in Brazil last
night after undocking from Ponta da Madeira terminal.
    Lloyds said the 200,000 dwt vessel is carrying about
180,000 tons of ore.
    Five holds are partially flooded and there is some leakage
of bunkers from double bottom tanks. At low water tide the
vessel has a list of five degrees to port and the list
increases as the tide rises.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12327>
There were five grain ships loading and
three ships were waiting to load at Portland, according to the
Portland Merchants Exchange.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12761>
Tug crews are preventing the movement of
foreign-flag container vessels in and out of the ports of
Sydney, Melbourne and Fremantle, shipping sources said.
    They said maritime unions imposed bans on late Wednesday
for reasons that are obscure but seem to be linked with claims
for a pay rise above the 10 dlrs a week awarded by the
Arbitration Commission nationally to all workers recently.
    Only about 10 vessels are being delayed but the bans will
affect container terminal movements and will disrupt liner
schedules, they said.
    The dispute goes to the Commission on Monday, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12768>
Grain handling at Rotterdam port's
main grain terminal was at a standstill today as members of the
largest Dutch transport union FNV staged a lightning strike for
the third day running.
    Pieter van der Vorm, managing director of Graan Elevator
Mij (GEM), which handles 95 pct of grain passing through the
port, said their main Europoort terminal was out of action
because of a strike by technical staff.
    The actions, in support of union demands in negotiations
over a new labour agreement, began on Wednesday when grain
handlers stopped work.
    Van der Vorm said that if strikes continued on today's
scale for some time vessels coming to unload grain in Rotterdam
would face delays, but this was not happening yet.
    Wednesday's actions left GEM's facilities 40 pct
operational, and there were only limited strikes yesterday.
    Talks between unions and employers yesterday and today
produced no result, but FNV spokesman Bert Duim said the union
was prepared to put their key demand, for a 36 hour working
week, at the bottom of the agenda.
    Van der Vorm said, however, the union's demands on a range
of issues were far in excess of the management's final offer.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12770>
South Korea will pay about 20 pct more for
ethylene imported from Japan in the second quarter of the year
because increased plastic production in both countries has
boosted demand and tightened supplies, chemical industry
sources said.
    South Korea has agreed to pay Japanese trading houses just
over 400 dlrs C and F per tonne, up from an average of 350 dlrs
in the first quarter and throughout 1986, they said.
    South Korean demand for imported ethylene this month has
risen to 17,000 tonnes from 10,000 last month, and the country
may face difficulties covering the extra volume, they said.
    &lt;Korea Petrochemical Industries Corp>, a producer of high
density polyethylene (HDPE) and polypropylene, will more than
double its ethylene requirements to 9,000 tonnes a month from
4,000 when it completes a plant expansion at the end of this
month, the sources said.
    &lt;Honan Ethylene Corp's> import requirements have risen to
8,000 tonnes a month from 6,000 tonnes last year to meet strong
demand from &lt;Honan Petrochemical Co>, which makes HDPE and
ethylene glycol, and &lt;Hangyang Chemical>, which produces
low-density polyethylene and vinyl chloride monomer, they said.
    But Japan's ethylene plants are already operating at almost
full capacity of 4.5 mln tonnes a year just to fulfill domestic
demand, the sources said.
    "And even if Japan had the additional ethylene, there is a
logistical problem of finding extra appropriate-sized vessels
to ship it to Korea," said one trading house source.
    Japanese trading companies are looking to alternative
sources to supply South Korea's needs, including Saudi Arabia,
Qatar and Mexico, they said.
    But long-haul voyages are expensive as the product has to
be shipped at a temperature of minus 103 degrees centigrade to
keep it in a liquid form, they said.
    Japan has no plans to invest further in the ethylene
industry in order to cope with the additional demand, despite
rising prices, trading house sources said.
    South Korea has two projects in hand which will increase
its ethylene production capacity by 500,000 tonnes a year by
the end of 1989, so the strong demand surge for imports is only
a medium-term trend, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12823>
Tug crews are preventing the movement of
foreign-flag container vessels in and out of the ports of
Sydney, Melbourne and Fremantle, shipping sources said.
    They said maritime unions imposed bans on late Wednesday
for reasons that are obscure but seem to be linked with claims
for a pay rise above the 10 dlrs a week awarded by the
Arbitration Commission nationally to all workers recently.
    Only about 10 vessels are being delayed but the bans will
affect container terminal movements and will disrupt liner
schedules, they said.
    The dispute goes to the Commission on Monday, they said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12849>
Active timecharter fixing by Soviet
operators to cover USSR grain imports featured the freight
market, ship brokers said.
    At least two fixtures were reported on Soviet account to
lift EC grain, with a 22,000 tonner booked from Tilbury for a
voyage via lower Baltic Sea and redelivery passing Skaw at
4,000 dlrs daily and a 27,000 tonner from Ceuta for a voyage
via the U.K. And redelivery Skaw-Cape Passero at 4,500 dlrs
daily.
    The Soviets also secured a 34,000 tonner from Gibraltar for
a trans-Atlantic round trip at 4,500 dlrs daily and a 61,000
tonner for similar business at 6,750 dlrs daily.
    Brokers said several other fixtures were also thought to be
connected with Soviet grain, including a 69,000 tonner from
Taranto for five to seven months at 6,500 dlrs daily. Similar
fixing was reported yesterday at 6,000 dlrs.
    Other timecharter fixing included a 14,000 tonner from
Indonesia to the U.S. Gulf at 2,800 dlrs daily and a combined
carrier of 75,000 tonnes dw from the U.S. Gulf to Italy at
9,000 dlrs daily.
    Severel vessels were booked from Antwerp-Hamburg range,
including a 61,000 tonner bound for Singapore-Japan at 7,500
dlrs daily and a 16,000 tonner destined for west coast India at
5,000 dlrs.
    Grain fixing was much quieter out of the U.S. Gulf, with no
fresh business seen on the significant routes to the Continent
or Japan, although tonnage was secured for at least five small
corn cargoes from the Gulf to Jamaica at between 21 and 25
dlrs. Wheat from the River Plate and Buenos Aires to Sri Lanka
received 26 dlrs.
    Market talk suggested 11 dlrs had been paid for grain from
the U.S. North Pacific to Japan but no confirmation was
available.
    Fairly active grain fixing emerged out of the Continent,
however, with maize covered from Nantes to Egypt at 15 dlrs,
and bagged flour from Greece to China at 27 dlrs.
    Barley cargoes were arranged from Immingham to the Red Sea
at 17.25 dlrs and from Foynes to Jeddah at 17.25 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12924>
The Panama Canal Commission, a U.S.
government agency, said in its daily operations report that
there was a backlog of 30 ships waiting to enter the canal
early today. Over the next two days it expects --              
             4/03  4/04
                       Due: 36    28
      Scheduled to Transit: 38    38
           End-Day Backlog: 28    18
    Average waiting time tomorrow --
         Super Tankers  Regular Vessels
 North End:  19 hrs       8 hrs
 South End:  20 hrs      16 hrs
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13074>
Iraq said its forces sank three Iranian
boats that tried to approach its disused deep water oil
terminal in the northern Gulf today.
    A military spokesman, quoted by the official Iraqi news
agency, said other Iranian boats fled. He did not identify the
vessels.
    Iraq's major oil outlets in the northern Gulf were closed
shortly after the war with Iran started in late 1980.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13120>
There were five grain ships loading and
three ships were waiting to load at Portland, according to the
Portland Merchants Exchange.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13162>
The Argentine Grain Board issued
the following figures covering shipments of major export grains
in the week to April 1, in tonnes, with comparisons for the
previous week and the same week in 1986.
    Bread wheat        235,800    205,700    115,500
    Maize              158,400    189,000    272,700
    Sorghum             26,500     18,700     39,900
    Soybean                nil        nil        nil
    Sunflowerseed        1,800     18,800        nil
    Cumulative figures for April 1 and this calendar year, with
the previous year's figures in brackets, are as follows, in
thousands of tonnes:
    Bread wheat        64.3   (44.5),    3,074.4   (2,851.4)
    Maize              48.3  (107.7),      486.1     (922.4)
    Sorghum             5.1   (22.2),      108.1     (188.8)
    Soybean             nil    (nil),        nil       (nil)
    Sunflowerseed       0.9    (nil),       43.2       (nil)
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13179>
Grain and oilseed complex export
business reported since yesterday by government agencies and
private exporters -
    Japanese crushers bought 4,000 to 5,000 tonnes of Canadian
rapeseed in export business overnight for May shipment...Greece
has agreed to buy 27,000 to 33,000 tonnes of Spanish corn for
spot shipment, with Italy buying 6,000 to 7,000 tonnes of
Spanish corn for last/half April shipment, a spokesman for
cargill's spanish unit said...Taiwan bought 54,000 tonnes of
U.S. soybeans for April 20/May 5 delivery C and F...
    (Continued) - The India State Trading Corp bought 20,000
tonnes of optional origin soybean oil for May 20/June 20
shipment and 6,000 tonnes of RBD palm olein for April 25/May 25
shipment at its import tender yesterday...Pakistan rejected
offers at its tender for 12,000 tonnes of RBD palm oil, but is
expected to retender next week...The U.S. Department of
Agriculture (USDA) said it has accepted a bid for an export
bonus to cover the sale of 50,000 tonnes of U.S. hard red
winter wehat to Sri Lanka for April 8/16 shipment, with an
additional 10,000 tonnes of wheat still available to Sri Lanka
under the Export Enhancement Program (EEP)...
    (Continued) - The USDA said it has accepted a bid for an
export bonus to cover the sale of 18,000 tonnes of U.S. durum
wheat to Algeria for June 20/30 shipment, with an additional
228,000 tonnes still available to Algeria under the EEP.
    Tenders - Jordan will tender Monday, April 6, for 225,000
tonnes of U.S. hard and soft wheats for various April/Nov
shipments under the EEP.
    Market talk and comment - The USDA said Turkey has been
made eligible for the sale of up to 70,000 tonnes of medium
grain milled rice under the EEP...
    Market talk and comment (continued) - The USDA announced
Colombia has been made eligible for sale of up to 15,000 tonnes
of U.S. barley malt under the EEP...The Canadian Grain
Commission reported Canadian wheat exports in the week ended
March 29 totalled 447,200 tonnes, compared with 277,700 the
previous week, with 1986/87 season exports so far up to
10,228,600 tonnes versus 10,637,500 for the 1985/86 season,
with barley exports 38,800 tonnes, 106,700 tonnes, 4,804,500
and 1,892,600 respectively, rapeseed 43,900 tonnes, 50,700
tonnes, 1,292,600 and 920,000 respectively and flaxseed 20,700
tonnes, 13,600 tonens, 450,900 and 392,600 respectively...
    Market talk and comment (continued) - Pakistan is not
emerging as a major wheat exporter as World market prospects
are not good enough, a government official said...Active
timecharter fixing by Soviet operators to cover USSR grain
imprts featured the ocean freight market this morning, ship
brokers said...Dry cargo futures on the BIFFEX extended
yesterday's strong advance, with sharp gains of 22 to 17 points
in response to rumors of higher rates for grain business from
the U.S. Gulf to Japan, dealers said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13247>
Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger has
ordered the U.S. Navy to increase its presence near the Gulf in
an effort to fulfil President Reagan's pledge to keep oil
flowing to Europe and Japan, The New York Times reported.
    The newspaper quoted Pentagon officials as saying the Navy
would keep the aircraft carrier Kitty Hawk on station in the
Arabian Sea and the rest of the Indian Ocean until May, three
months longer than planned.
    The Navy would then have a carrier battle group of six to
eight warships in the area at all times rather than part of the
time, as happens now, the paper said.
    The paper said that last month U.S. Intelligence sources
said they had spotted land-based anti-ship missiles of a
Chinese design known in the West as the HY-2 near the Strait of
Hormuz.
    It said their purpose was seen as a signal Iran was ready
to continue and perhaps step up the Gulf shipping war against
Iraq.
    U.S. Carriers or battleships would sail out of range of
those missiles, but within striking distance, the paper quoted
officials as saying.
    From several hundred miles at sea, carriers could launch
aircraft bombing runs or missile strikes, and battleships could
fire long-range missiles, the paper said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13320>
Kuwait may re-register part of its
tanker fleet with foreign flag jurisdictions, including the
U.S. And USSR, in an attempt to protect them from Iranian
missile attacks in the Gulf war zone, U.S. Officials were
quoted by the New York Times as saying.
    The transfers would allow the country of registration to
escort Kuwaiti-owned ships in the Gulf. Kuwait had earlier
declined an offer of U.S. Naval escorts as too public an
admission of its need for protection, they said.
    Kuwait is also looking at flagging-out to European
registries, the officials said.
    Soviet flag tankers transporting Kuwaiti oil through the
Gulf may get Soviet escorts, the officials said.
    Kuwait had earlier considered having both USSR and U.S.
Escorts, but the U.S. Was unwilling to give the Soviet Union a
naval role in the region, the newspaper quoted the officials as
saying.
    Kuwait has backed Iraq in the seven-year war against Iran
and its ships have increasingly been the target of Iranian
attacks.
    The U.S. And Kuwait have been negotiating for over a month
on methods of protecting Kuwaiti ships.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13542>
Kuwait may re-register part of its
tanker fleet with foreign flag jurisdictions, including the
U.S. And USSR, in an attempt to protect them from Iranian
missile attacks in the Gulf war zone, U.S. Officials were
quoted by the New York Times as saying.
    The transfers would allow the country of registration to
escort Kuwaiti-owned ships in the Gulf. Kuwait had earlier
declined an offer of U.S. Naval escorts as too public an
admission of its need for protection, they said.
    Kuwait is also looking at flagging-out to European
registries, the officials said.
    Soviet flag tankers transporting Kuwaiti oil through the
Gulf may get Soviet escorts, the officials said.
    Kuwait had earlier considered having both USSR and U.S.
Escorts, but the U.S. Was unwilling to give the Soviet Union a
naval role in the region, the newspaper quoted the officials as
saying.
    Kuwait has backed Iraq in the seven-year war against Iran
and its ships have increasingly been the target of Iranian
attacks.
    The U.S. And Kuwait have been negotiating for over a month
on methods of protecting Kuwaiti ships.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13688>
A Brazilian seamen's strike, which
began on February 27 and has been tapering off for weeks, has
now ended, a seamen's spokesman said.
    The spokesman said the seamen had signed an agreement with
the state-owned Lloyd Brasileiro company on Saturday for a 120
pct salary rise.
    The national strike had been tailing off since mid-March as
seamen struck individual accords with companies. At the height
of the stoppage, seamen said about 200 ships were strike-bound.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13963>
Kuwait has asked at least four
countries, including the United States, Soviet Union, Britain
and China, for temporary use of their flags or tankers to
protect Kuwaiti oil shipments in the troubled Persian Gulf,
Reagan Administration officials said.
    The officials confirmed a New York Times report that Kuwait
wants to transfer some of its oil tankers to U.S. or Soviet
registration in hopes Iran would be reluctant to launch new
"Silkworm" missiles at superpower flags.
    The United States has vowed to keep the gulf open to
international oil traffic and has warned Tehran against using
the Chinese-made missiles recently installed in Iran near the
mouth of the gulf.
    "They (the Kuwaitis) have also asked Britain, China and
possibly some other European countries to lease tankers to
carry their oil," one of the administration officials, who asked
not to be identified, told Reuters.
    The United States is considering the request to temporarily
transfer Kuwaiti ships to American registration, but such a
move could create insurance and other problems, the officials
said.
    U.S. defense officials told Reuters yesterday that Kuwait
had decided for at least the time being not to accept a U.S.
offer to use American warships to escort its tankers in the
gulf, where both Iran and Iraq have been attacking shipping.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14211>
Kuwait has asked at least four
countries, including the United States, Soviet Union, Britain
and China, for temporary use of their flags or tankers to
protect Kuwaiti oil shipments in the troubled Persian Gulf,
Reagan Administration officials said.
    The officials confirmed a New York Times report that Kuwait
wants to transfer some of its oil tankers to U.S. or Soviet
registration in hopes Iran would be reluctant to launch new
"Silkworm" missiles at superpower flags.
    The United States has vowed to keep the gulf open to
international oil traffic and has warned Tehran against using
the Chinese-made missiles recently installed in Iran near the
mouth of the gulf.
    "They (the Kuwaitis) have also asked Britain, China and
possibly some other European countries to lease tankers to
carry their oil," one of the administration officials, who asked
not to be identified, told Reuters.
    The United States is considering the request to temporarily
transfer Kuwaiti ships to American registration, but such a
move could create insurance and other problems, the officials
said.
    U.S. defense officials told Reuters yesterday that Kuwait
had decided for at least the time being not to accept a U.S.
offer to use American warships to escort its tankers in the
gulf, where both Iran and Iraq have been attacking shipping.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14360>
Nine grain ships were loading and 16
were waiting to load at New Orleans elevators, trade sources
said.
 ELEVATOR                     LOADING  WAITING
 Continental Grain, Westwego     1      5
 Mississippi River, Myrtle Grove 1      0
 ADM Growmark                    1      2
 Bunge Grain, Destrehan          1      0
    ELEVATOR                LOADING  WAITING
 ST CHARLES DESTREHAN         1      1
 RESERVE ELEVATOR CORP        1      0
 PEAVEY CO, ST ELMO           1      1
 CARGILL GRAIN, TERRE HAUTE   1      4
 CARGILL GRAIN, PORT ALLEN    0      0
 ZEN-NOH                      1      3
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14491>
Honduras will tender April 13 under
Public Law 480 for U.S. and non-U.S. flag vessels to deliver
approximately 52,500 tonnes of various wheats in bulk, an agent
for the country said.
    The agent said deliveries of northern spring/dns wheat will
include laydays of July 1-10 for 7,500-9,500 tonnes, August
1-10 for 8,000-10,000 tonnes, and September 15-25 for
12,500-14,500 tonnes.
    Deliveries of hard red winter wheat will have laydays of
June 20-30 for 5,000-7,000 tonnes, July 15-25 for 6,500-8,500
tonnes, and September 15-25 for 7,000-9,000 tonnes.
    Offers are due by 1200 hrs EDT, April 13, and will remain
valid until the close of business April 14, the agent said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14537>
Bermuda Star Line Inc said it has
leased a 23,500 ton passenger vessel from Orley Shipping Co
Inc, of Liberia for a term with options extending for 15 years.
    The vessel, SS Liberte, will be renamed the Canadian Star
and will be used for cruises to Montreal from New York,
beginning in June.
    Orley SHipping is partially owned by Common Brothers PLC, a
U.K. maritime firm which owns 60 pct of Bermuda Star's shares
and arranged debt financing for the ship's purchase.
    Orley acquired the vessel from Banstead Shipping Ltd. Terms
were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14688>
There were six grain ships loading and
six ships were waiting to load at Portland, according to the
Portland Merchants Exchange.
  
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14818>
Australian trade unions said they have
launched week-long strikes and other industrial action in New
South Wales (NSW) to protest against new laws that would reduce
injury compensation payments.
    Union sources said talks with the state government broke
down last night, but the two sides are scheduled to meet later
today in an attempt to find a compromise.
    Rail freight and shipping cargo movements in the country's
most populous state were the first to be affected, and union
officials said almost every business sector will be hit unless
there is a quick settlement.
    The state government recently introduced a new workers'
compensation act which would cut the cash benefits to injured
workers by up to a third. The act is now awaiting parliamentary
ratification.
    NSW state premier Barrie Unsworth has said workers'
compensation has risen steeply in recent years and the proposed
cuts would save hundreds of mlns of dollars a year.
    Union officials said industrial action could spread to
other states as the federal government also plans to make sharp
cuts in workers' compensation.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2012>
Blizzard conditions halted shipping
through the Bosphorus waterway and piled snow up to 70 cms deep
in central Istanbul, paralysing the city for the second day
running.
    Snow whipped by 48 kph winds continued to fall on Istanbul
and northwest Anatolia after 36 hours and weather reports
predicted no relief for another two days.
    Port officials said at least six large vessels in the Black
Sea and 13 in the Sea of Marmara were waiting for conditions to
improve.
    Istanbul's Ataturk international airport has been closed
since yesterday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2187>
Strong winds and high seas
today closed Alexandria, Egypt's biggest port, and an oil
pipeline terminal nearby, officials said.
    Facilities of the Suez-Mediterranean Arab Petroleum
Pipelines Company at Sidi Kreir, 32 km southeast of Alexandria,
were closed this morning after one tanker loaded and sailed.
    Officials said that five other tankers were waiting outside
the terminal for conditions to improve.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2310>
Dutch Social Affairs Minister Louw de
Graaf announced he is withdrawing the annual 10 mln guilder
labour subsidy for Rotterdam's strike-hit general cargo sector
as from July 1.
    Late last month de Graaf said that if the dispute was not
settled by Monday this week he would withdraw the subsidy.
    The chairman of the port employers' organization, SVZ,
Jacques Schoufour, said he was unhappy with the decision and
added there was now no alternative to proceeding with
redundancy plans.
    The series of strikes in the sector started on January 19
in protest at employers' plans to make 800 redundancies from
the 4,000-strong workforce by 1990 starting with 350 this year.
    Meanwhile, the port and transport union, FNV, attacked loss
figures given for the port for this year.
    The figures, issued by accountants on behalf of the SVZ,
put total losses for last year at 34 mln guilders and in 1985
at 37 mln. Earlier, the employers had put the figure at around
30 mln.
    The FNV said the actual losses were nearer 17 to 20 mln and
said the employers had inflated the figures as part of their
plan to restructure completely the port's general cargo sector.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2326>
Striking Brazilian seamen, who say
they have made idle 158 ships and halted Brazilian exports,
today held pay talks in Rio de Janeiro with Labour Minister
Almir Pazzianotto, union officials said.
    Jorge Luis Leao Franco, a senior official of the National
Merchant Marine Union, told Reuters he was optimistic the talks
would lead to an end of the stoppage, which began last Friday.
    Brazil's 40,000 seamen are seeking a pay rise of 275 pct.
    The union official said the strike had halted a total of
158 vessels, including 50 in Brazil's main port, Santos, and
about 50 more in Rio de Janeiro.
    Abroad, six ships lay idle, in the Netherlands, Spain,
Venezuela, France and South Africa, he said.
    Economic analysts said the strike was of serious concern to
the government, which has already had to suspend interest
payments on part of Brazil's foreign debt following a drastic
deterioration in the country's trade balance.
    The head of the National Merchant Marine Authority, Murilo
Rubens Habbema, was quoted in today's Gazeta Mercantil
newspaper as saying that if the strike continued foreign ships
could be authorized to transport Brazilian exports.
    "Brazil is living through a crisis at the moment, and it is
not conceivable that exports be hit," he said.
    "But even using foreign ships we must not forget that we are
going to lose foreign exchange paying freight charges abroad,
and all this through the fault of the seamen," Rubens Habbema
said.
    A spokesman for the port of Santos, which has been the
scene of labour unrest and congestion in recent months, said
movement of ships out of the port was running at about half its
normal level of 12 ships a day.
    He said a total of 76 ships were either waiting at anchor
on moored in the harbour.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2542>
Pay talks aimed at ending a
week-old national seamen's strike collapsed today and the
strike will continue, a union official said.
    The walkout by Brazil's 40,000 seamen has idled 160 ships
in various ports, Jorge Luis Leao Franco, a senior official of
the National Merchant Marine Union, told Reuters.
    The strikers, who are seeking a 275 pct pay increase, have
rejected offers of a 100 pct raise from the state oil company
Petrobras and an 80 pct increase from the National Union of
Maritime Navigation Companies (Syndarma).
    Leao Franco said eight hours of talks in Rio de Janeiro
with Labor Minister Almir Pazzianotto ended today without
resolving the dispute.
    He said six ships were idle abroad -- in the Netherlands,
Spain, Venezuela, France and South Africa.
    Economic analysts said the strike was of major concern to
the government, which has suspended interest payments on part
of Brazil's foreign debt following a drastic deterioration in
the country's trade balance.
    The head of the National Merchant Marine Authority, Murilo
Rubens Habbema, was quoted today as saying that if the strike
continued foreign ships could be authorized to transport
Brazilian exports.
    "Brazil is living through a crisis at the moment and it is
not conceivable that exports be hit," he told the Gazeta
Mercantil newspaper.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2635>
Limited shipping restrictions due to high
water remain in force on parts of the West German stretch of
the Rhine river between the Dutch border and the city of Mainz
but most are expected to be lifted this weekend.
    water authority officials said The restrictions, caused by
high water levels, include speed limits and directives to keep
to the middle of the river to prevent damage to the river
banks. The high water was expected to recede within two days to
below levels at which the restrictions come into force.
    Traffic was halted briefly late Tuesday night, Wednesday
and parts of Thursday on stretches of the Rhine between Bonn
and Koblenz but the shipping bans were lifted, the officials
said. Shipping is now permitted on all parts of the West German
section of the Rhine, with restrictions in some areas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2681>
The Mississippi River is now open for
barge traffic up to the Twin Cities in Minnesota after repairs
were completed and the first barges moved upstream through Lock
and Dam 20 near Quincy, Ill at 0600 CST today, an Army Corps of
Engineers spokesman said.
    About 14 to 15 inches of ice were reported between locks
three and four on the upper Mississippi River, but other
sections were generally free of ice, the spokesman said.
    Midwestern weather has been so mild that barges probably
could have kept loading at Mid-Mississippi River terminals
through the winter, if Lock and Dam 20 had not been scheduled
for repairs, he said.
    The Peoria and La Grange locks on the Illinois River are
still scheduled to close July 13, for two months of repairs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2819>
The channel ferry Herald
of Free Enterprise from the British Townsend Thorensen company
was sinking off the Belgian coast tonight with 463 people on
board, the Dutch newsagency ANP reported today.
    An unspecified number of people had fallen into the water,
it said, quoting the pilot organisation in this south-western
Dutch port city near the Belgian border.
    It said the vessel had capsized after a collision but gave
no more details.
    Dan Kaakebeen a spokesman for the Dutch salvage firm Smit
International told Reuters by telephone from Rotterdam that the
vessel was just off the Belgian port of Zeebrugge with 463
passengers and crew when the accident occurred at 1850 GMT.
    Kaakebeen said the firm had one vessel at the scene and
another on its way with divers on board.
    A spokesman at the port authority of nearby Vlissingen said
attempts were being made to pull the vessel into shallow
waters.
    Weather conditions were good with no fog or wind, and there
were many other vessels in the area.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2828>
Strikes by Brazil's 40,000
seamen and by petrol station owners in four states are causing
major headaches to a government already wrestling with a debt
crisis.
    A week ago seamen began their first national strike for 25
years and union leaders say they have seriously affected
Brazilian exports by making idle 160 ships.
    On February 20 the Brazilian government suspended interest
payments on part of its huge foreign debt following a sharp
deterioration in its trade balance.
    Today the government faced a fresh problem, when most
petrol station owners in Sao Paulo, the country's industrial
heartland, and in three other states closed down to press for
higher fuel prices.
    There were fears that the combination of the two stoppages
could lead to a serious fuel shortage.
    The seamen's leaders say their strike has halted 48 of the
72 ships belonging to the state oil company Petrobras.
    The Jornal do Brasil newspaper, in an editorial today
entitled "Dangerous Confrontation," said: "From the economic
point of view the seamen's strike carries an alarming cost,
with grave consequences for the supply situation and for the
country's external trade."
    The seamen are seeking a 275 pct pay rise and have rejected
offers of up to 100 pct.
    Later today the Higher Labour Tribunal in Brasilia is due
to rule on whether the seamen's strike is legal. But a senior
official of the National Merchant Marine Union, Jorge Luis Leao
Franco, told Reuters that the strike would continue regardless
of the tribunal's ruling.
    Labour unrest has worsened in Brazil following the collapse
over the last few months of the government's Cruzado Plan price
freeze. Prices have been rising at about 15 pct a month. Not
only workers but also businessmen are restive. Petrol station
owners said many garages had closed indefinitely today in Sao
Paulo, Parana, Mato Grosso and Mato Grosso do Sul.
    Television reports said that in the Parana state capital of
Curitiba petrol stations were only supplying fuel for
exceptional cases such as ambulances and funeral processions.
    Brazilian garage owners want to be allowed to raise their
profits on alcohol fuel and petrol sales to 1.26 cruzados (six
U.S. Cents) a litre from 0.56 cruzados (about 2.5 cents).
    Queues formed at petrol stations in Sao Paulo late last
night as motorists filled up their tanks while they still
could.
    Political sources said the government of President Jose
Sarney was closely following the strikes and the overall fuel
supply situation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2853>
About 200 people were rescued, some
badly hurt, from a sinking cross Channel ferry carrying
approximately 540 people off the Belgian port of Zeebrugge, a
port control spokesman said.
    The spokesman, contacted by telephone, said only one third
of car ferry, the Herald of Free Enterprise owned by the
British company Townsend Thoresen, remained above water.
    Divers have been sent down to try to rescue passengers
believed trapped in the ferry, which was on its way from
Zeebrugge to the English port of Dover and capsized just off
the pier, he added
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2944>
At least 26 people died when
a car ferry struck a pier as it left Belgium for Britain, a
nurse who took part in the rescue operation said.
    Jan Van Moerbeke, a male nurse, said on coming off the
Herald of Free Enterprise that he had found six people on top
of the vessel who were dead. There were at least another 20
dead inside the boat, he added.
    The governor of West Flanders province said 240 people were
still unaccounted for.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2955>
About 200 people are feared
dead after a British cross-channel ferry rolled on its side off
the Belgian coast last night -- but almost 350 passengers were
plucked to safety from the ice-cold sea.
    Belgian Transport Minister Herman de Croo told reporters: "I
fear the dead could be in hundreds, perhaps 200. Given the
state of the water, I fear there is no hope."
    Townsend Thorensen, owners of the 7,951 tonne Herald of
Free Enterprise, said the ferry was carrying 543 people and
that 345 had been rescued. All but one were British.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2958>
Fading hope for passengers trapped aboard
a partially-sunk Channel ferry raised fears the accident could
rank among this centuries' worst peacetime shipping tragedies.
    Belgian Transport Minister Herman de Croo said there was no
hope of rescuing any of about 220 passengers trapped in the
Herald of Free Enterprise after it capsized off the Belgian
coast last night.
    If confirmed, the toll would make the incident the world's
worst since a Soviet liner, the Admiral Nakhimov, collided with
a freighter in the Black Sea last September and sank with the
loss of nearly 400 lives. A further 856 people were rescued.
    The world's deadliest single peacetime incident at sea was
the sinking in 1912 of the Titanic with a loss of 1,500 lives.
    The second biggest loss of life in peacetime was in 1914
when 1,014 people drowned when the liner Empress of Ireland
collided with a freighter on the St Lawrence river in Canada.
    The world's worst maritime disaster was in wartime that
took 7,700 lives when the German liner Wilhelm Gustloff was
torpedoed by a Soviet submarine in January 30, 1945.
    In 1985, more than 200 were feared dead after two ferries
sank near Dhaka, 174 drowned when a ferry capsized in China and
147 died when a launch sank off the Malaysian state of Sabah.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2959>
There are no more survivors from a
British cross-Channel ferry disaster off the Belgian coast and
almost 200 people seem certain to have perished, a senior
Belgian official said.
    Jacques Thas, in charge of rescue for the Herald of Free
Enterprise, said his men had searched all of the ship except
some inaccessible cabins and the control room.
    "I am afraid there are no more survivors," he said. Thas said
32 of the 543 passsengers and crew were confirmed dead and 160
were missing, bringing the total of dead or presumed dead to
192.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2968>
As a British government investigation got
under way into the sinking of the car ferry Herald of Free
Enterprise with heavy loss of life, experts said doubts had
already been expressed about the roll-on roll-off type of ship.
    Shipping minister Lord Brabazon said a preliminary
investigation had started into why the 7,951 tonne ferry
capsized and sank in little over a minute as it manoeuvred to
leave Zeebrugge on a routine four hour crossing to Dover.
    Initial reports spoke of water flooding the car decks
through the bow doors. But a spokesman for the owners, Townsend
Thoresen, said it was also possible the ferry had been holed.
    Townsend Thoresen operate two other ships identical to the
Herald of Free Enterprise, but Brabazon said it was not planned
to pull them out of service at present.
    "Our investigator is there already. We shall have to wait
and see. But it is too early to say what happened," he told BBC
radio.
    As the work of retrieving bodies from the half-submerged
hulk continued, maritime safety experts in London said doubts
had already been expressed about the design of so-called "RoRo"
ferries such as the Herald of Free Enterprise.
    In 1980 the Inter-Governmental International Maritime
Consultative Committee issued a report saying more roll-on
roll-off vessels were lost in accidents than ships with deck
areas divided by bulkheads.
    Townsend Thoresen say the ship, built at the West German
yard of Bremerhaven in 1980, was built to the highest safety
standards.
    But salvage expert William Cooper said passengers would
have had problems getting off this type of ship because of its
design.
    Former Townsend Thoresen navigating officer Clive Langley
said the RoRo type of vessels were similar in some respects to
a barge.
    "As any sailor knows it only takes two or three inches out
of line and you can turn a barge over. An ordinary ship is
compartmentalised and you have more stability," he said.
    Cooper said cross-Channel ferries were normally perfectly
stable but had huge wide deck areas above the water level.
    "If you do get water into that area then you can get very
severe effects on the stability of the ship," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2971>
Hundreds of marines were on alert
at 11 key Brazilian ports after 40,000 seamen decided to remain
on indefinite strike, even after the Higher Labour Court
yesterday ruled it illegal, union leaders said.
    The halt, the first national strike by seamen in 25 years,
started on February 27, and union leaders said they would not
return to work unless they got a 275 pct pay rise. Shipowners
have offered a 100 per cent raise, which the seamen rejected.
    "We have nothing to lose. If they want to lay off the
workers, fine, but we are determined to carry on with our
protest until the end," a union leader said.
    He said they had decided in a meeting that if the marines
take over the ships, the seamen would abandon the vessels and
let the marines handle the situation by themselves.
    A spokesman for the Rio de Janeiro Port said the order to
send marines to take over the ports was given by Navy Minister
Henrique Saboya on grounds that ports are areas of national
security. But he said there were no incidents. The strike has
cut exports and imports and made an estimated 160 ships idle.
    Petrol station owners in four states also continued their
shutdown and there were fears that the combination of the two
stoppages could lead to a serious fuel shortage.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3017>
A strike by Brazil's 40,000 seafarers
who want pay rises of up to 180 pct may have cost the
state-owned oil company Petrobras 20 mln dlrs in lost export
orders, the company's commercial director Arthur de Carvalho
was quoted as saying in press reports.
    More than 170 ships in Brazil, and about nine more in
foreign ports, have been halted by the strike, which began on
February 27.
    Marines began blockading the ships on Friday after the
strike was ruled illegal, and some strikers are running short
of food, National Merchants Marine Union president Edson Areias
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3028>
Hundreds of marines were on alert
at 11 key Brazilian ports after 40,000 seamen decided to remain
on indefinite strike, even after the Higher Labour Court
Saturday ruled it illegal, union leaders said.
    The halt, the first national strike by seamen in 25 years,
started on February 27, and union leaders said they would not
return to work unless they got a 275 pct pay rise. Shipowners
have offered a 100 per cent raise, which the seamen rejected.
    "We have nothing to lose. If they want to lay off the
workers, fine, but we are determined to carry on with our
protest until the end," a union leader said.
 more
    He said they had decided in a meeting that if the marines
take over the ships, the seamen would abandon the vessels and
let the marines handle the situation by themselves.
    A spokesman for the Rio de Janeiro Port said the order to
send marines to take over the ports was given by Navy Minister
Henrique Saboya on grounds that ports are areas of national
security. But he said there were no incidents. The strike has
cut exports and imports and made an estimated 160 ships idle.
    Petrol station owners in four states also continued their
shutdown and there were fears that the combination of the two
stoppages could lead to a serious fuel shortage.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3046>
Container port operator, &lt;Hong Kong
International Terminals Ltd>, a 89 pct held unit of Hutchison
Whampoa Ltd &lt;HWHH.HK>, said it has placed a 164 mln H.K. Dlr
order for seven quayside container cranes of 800 tons each with
Japan's Mitsui Engineering and Shipbuilding Co Ltd &lt;MSET.T> for
May 1988 to August 1989 delivery.
    Hong Kong International Terminals operates 32 cranes.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3047>
Istanbul remained at a virtual
standstill today under snow up to a meter deep but shipping was
moving through the narrow Bosphorus waterway linking the Sea of
Marmara and the Black Sea, officials said.
    The authorities ordered government offices closed until
Wednesday. Many banks, businesses and schools stayed shut as
workers struggled to keep main roads and supply lines open in
this city of 6.5 mln people.
    The second blizzard to hit Istanbul in a week stopped
yesterday afternoon and the international airport reopened
today after a two-day closure. It was also shut earlier last
week.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3110>
The National Weather Service said
warnings of gale force winds remained in effect over lakes
Erie, Huron and Michigan.
    Also, warnings have been posted for large waves and beach
erosion along the shores of the Lakes. Winds gusting to 45 mph
caused four to six foot waves along the western and southern
shores of Lake Michigan during the morning.
    Advisories for low wind chill temperatures have also been
posted across portions of upper Michigan and northern lower
Michigan. Early morning gusty winds brought the wind chill to
15 and 25 degrees below zero.
    Freezing rain was scattered over central Colorado by mid
morning, also over central Kansas and northeast Illinois.
    Snow reached from south central Montana across Wyoming,
western Nebraska and western Kansas. Snow also extended across
northern Wisconsin, upper Michigan and northern lower Michigan.
    Rain reached along the northern Pacific Coast, across
northwest Utah, Maryland, Deleware, Virginia, the Carolinas,
Georgia and northern Alabama.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3217>
U.K. Insurers could face more than 30 mln
stg of insurance claims following the Zeebrugge ferry disaster,
a spokesman for Lloyds of London said.
    It could take weeks before the extent of the compensation
claims for passengers, crew and cargo was known and also before
it was known how much, if any, of the ship could be salvaged,
said David Larner of Lloyds.
    The hull and machinery of the Herald of Free Enterprise
were valued at 25 mln stg and were insured by Townsend
Thoresen's parent company Peninsular and Oriental Steam
Navigation Co Plc &lt;PORL.L>.
    The vessel was in turn reinsured in the London market with
Lloyds and various other companies, Larner said.
    Passengers, crew and cargo were insured by the Standard
Steamship Protection and Indemnity Association, one of several
shipowners' mutual insurance funds worldwide. These were also
underwritten by Lloyds and other companies.
    Larner said claims from passengers could be expected to
total at least five mln stg, given the number of deaths and the
normal level of liability set by the Athens Convention of 1974
of between 30,000 stg and 50,000 in case of death.
    Shipping sources said, however, that these claims could
soar if a court found there was negligence or design faults
involved.
    Larner said estimates of compensation claims "were pure
guess work" at this time. But if the ship could not be salvaged,
the claims would total at least 30 mln stg.
    Shares of insurances on the London stock exchange fell
across the board in a generally weak market.
    General Accident fell 21p to 936, Royal Insurance dropped
18p to 966 and Prudential fell 9p to 888.
    P and O shares stood at a late 616, 27p lower on the day.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3256>
wheat Ria Luna 20,000 mt
Norrkoping and Djuron/EC Mexico 12.50 dlrs option loading
Uddevalla at 50 cents less 4,000/1,500 16-23/3 Continental.
    Reference New York Grain Freights 2 of March 6, brokers say
the charterer of the Saturn from US Gulf to Japan is reported
to be Nordstrom and Thulin, while the Antigone is reported to
have been arranged from Tilbury to the Black Sea by Soviet
charterers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3259>
Bermuda Star Line Inc said it has
agreed in principle to acquire 815-passenger SS Liberte from
Barnstead Shipping Ltd for use in its New York/Montreal
"Northeast Passages" cruises, starting this summer.
    The company said it is working to conclude a lease
financing or other financing for the purchase of the 23,500 ton
vessel, which is to be delivered in early April and renamed
Canada Star.
    Terms were not disclosed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3285>
The volume of European exports to
South Africa carried by container line vessels has declined 40
pct in the last two years, British shipping executive Antony
Butterwick said.
    Butterwick told reporters that despite the drop and low
freight rates, the shipping conference he heads will increase
the frequency of sailings to South Africa as a "very strong act
of faith and confidence" in the country's future.
    He is chairman of the Europe South and South-East African
Conference Lines and joint managing director of P and O
Containers Ltd.
    A statement issued by the conference here said frequency of
Southern Africa/Europe container service sailings is being
increased from nine to seven days.
    "This is the most positive development on the shipping front
between South Africa and its main trading partners in Europe
for more than four years, when the service last operated
weekly," it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3329>
Brazilian marines were today
working on the unloading of ships at the local port as a
national strike by 40,000 seamen entered its 10th day without
signs of an agreement.
    The halt, the first national strike by seamen in 25 years,
started on February 27, and union leaders said they would not
return to work unless they received a 275 pct pay rise.
    Shipowners have offered a 100 pct raise, which the seamen
rejected.
    "Television reported that the port was operating at full
speed, but that's not true," a striking seaman told Reuters.
    "The marines are doing their best, but they don't have the
manpower nor the experience to control the situation in such a
quick period," he said.
    Port officials said the national halt had already caused
losses estimated at 1.5 mln dlrs.
    Despite the presence of marines, there were no reports of
incidents.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3347>
The New York Shipping Association and
International Longshoremen's Association said they agreed to
cut cargo assessments at the Port of New York and New Jersey by
more than 50 pct on some labor intensive cargos.
    The charges on cargo handled by union workers will be
reduced to 2.85 dlrs a ton from 5.85 dlrs a ton, effective
April one, according to the agreement between the union and
shippers. The assessments are used to fund workers' benefits.
    "What were doing is lowering the price to get more bulk
cargo flowing through here," a spokesman for the New York
Shipping Association said.


</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3349>
CSX Corp's Sea-Land Corp unit
said it will offer improved containership services between
Puerto Rico and the East Coast and Gulf Coast of the United
States, beginning March 16.
    The carrier said it will provide shorter door-to-door
transit times, more convenient cargo availability and better
rail connections for traffic moving between Puerto Rico and
North America.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3386>
There were three grain ships loading
and two ships were waiting to load at Portland, according to
the Portland Merchants Exchange.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3440>
The search continued for a
cargo of poisonous chemical substances loaded on the Herald of
Free Enterprise Ferry which capsized in Zeebrugge harbour
Friday.
    A total of 72 drums of various toxic materials which were
loaded on trucks in the ship's hold have been recovered, but
Belgian authorities warned it was essential to recover a
further 61 containers of a cyanide-based solution.
    A net has been thrown over the gaping loading doors at the
front of the ship to prevent any more drums floating out.
    Salvage workers have moved cranes into place alongside the
wreck of the 7,951 ton roll-on, roll-off ferry which now lies
partly submerged on a sandbank outside the harbour.
    The ferry's owner is &lt;European Ferries Plc>, majority owned
by Peninsular and Oriental Steam Navigation Co Plc &lt;PORL.L>.
    The operation to right the vessel began yesterday after
divers abandoned their search for more bodies. Experts said it
could take months to refloat the ship and free the 80 bodies
estimated to be trapped amid debris.
    "The problem is that in these waters you can normally expect
one working day out of four," said Daan Kaakebeen of Dutch
Salvage experts Smit Tak International of Rotterdam. He
estimated the job itself would require 35 working days.
    Using reinforced cables, salvage experts intend to raise
the ship and set it down into a trench dug alongside.
    Salvage work could pinpoint the exact cause of the loss of
the ferry, one of three sister vessels plying cross-Channel
routes from England to continental Europe.
    Suspicion at present is focused on the ferry's main vehicle
loading doors, set close to water level.
    In London, Transport Secretary John Moore told parliament
yesterday that the ship keeled over after water gushed in
through the bow doors. He said a major government inquiry into
the disaster will be held, all similar ferries sailing from
Britain will be inspected and owners will be asked to fit
lights to give warning if bow doors are not properly closed.
    Experts carrying out tank and computer tests to determine
how the accident occurred will focus attention on the ship's
doors, its ballast system and crew procedures, he added.
    Two other investigations into the disaster have also begun,
one Belgian and one by the ferry's owners.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3473>
Cargo handling remains
halted at Bangladesh's Chittagong port since nearly 7,000
workers walked out on Monday following a pay dispute, the Port
Workers Association said today.
    Fourteen ships are stranded at the port.
    Port officials said they would meet Association leaders
today to try to resolve the dispute.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3572>
Dutch port and transport union, FNV,
is presenting its case against 800 planned redundancies in
Rotterdam's general cargo sector to parliament's standing
committee on social affairs today, a union spokesman said.
    With 285 of the 4,000-strong workforce on strike, the union
will tell the committee the government has a duty to help solve
the dispute that has been disrupting the general cargo sector
for more than seven weeks, the spokesman added.
    The union will also take its case against the redundancies,
350 of them planned for this year, to a court in Amsterdam
tomorrow, he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3796>
Dutch members of parliament said they
could do little to help resolve the dispute over redundancies
in Rotterdam port's general cargo sector and urged the union
and employers to sort out their differences themselves.
    Both sides gave evidence to the all-party standing
committee on Social Affairs today, but committee members said
they saw little chance of parliamentary intervention.
    The dispute began on January 19 in protest at employers'
plans for 800 redundancies from the 4,000-strong workforce,
starting with 350 this year. The port and transport union, FNV,
is to challenge the redundancies in an Amsterdam court
tomorrow.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3830>
American President Cos Ltd said
its American President Lines shipping subsidiary  obtained
final approval from U.S. and Japanese authorities to lease four
new ships from Lykes Bros Co.
    The move will will enable it to boost service in the
Pacific by 15 pct in 1987, American President said.
    The company said it will lease the ships for three years
and hold two additional three-year options.
    It said American President Lines is currently operating at
capacity in the Pacific and the new ships will arrive in time
for the normal demand surge of the spring and summer seasons.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3869>
With troops in place in Brazil's
ports and oil installations, the government of Prersident Jose
Sarney today sought to end a wave of labour unrest by a show of
force.
    Yesterday the government sent thousands of troops supported
in some instances by tanks to occupy nine oil refineries and
six areas of oil production.
    The state-oil company Petrobras requested the intervention
because of a threatened strike by 55,000 oil industry
employees.
    The government had already dispatched more than 1,000
marines to occupy the country's main ports after a national
seamen's strike was ruled illegal last Friday.
    The strike by 40,000 seamen, now in its 13th day,
represents a stern challenge to the government.
    The stoppage has delayed exports at a time when Brazil
desperately needs foreign exchange.
    It was a deterioration in the country's trade balance which
precipitated Brazil's current debt crisis and the decision on
February 20 to suspend interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of
commercial debt.
    There was no sign today of an early end to the seamen's
strike, which has badly hit the port of Santos -- the most
important in South America -- and the country's other main
ports.
    Small groups of marines armed with submachineguns stand on
the quays near the strike-bound ships, but the military
presence here is generally discreet.
    A total of 800 marines are inside the docks but most are
out of sight.
    Yesterday marines and police occupied one ship, the
Docemarte, seamen's leaders said. After explaining to the
captain that the strikers faced up to one year in jail because
the strike was illegal, the men returned to work.
    One of the strike leaders, Elmano Barbosa, said "it is a
psychological war. They are using force and we are using
peaceful methods."
    Port sources said only two Brazilian ships in Santos, the
Docemarte and the Henrique Leal, were working.
    At the seamen's national strike headquarters in Rio de
Janeiro, spokesmen say a total of about 190 ships are
strike-bound in Brazil and in foreign ports.
    Contradicting earlier reports from strike headquarters in
Rio de Janeiro, seamen in Santos said the strikers on board
ships here were not running out of food.
    The current labour unrest is the worst faced by Sarney's
civilian government since it came to power two years ago.
    Yesterday, in a separate protest, hundreds of thousands of
farmers held rallies directed largely against high bank
interest rates.
    The current rash of labour unrest in industry and
agriculture stems from the failure of the government's
now-collapsed Cruzado Plan price freeze.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3955>
An 11-day-old strike by
Brazilian seamen is affecting coffee shipments and could lead
to a short term supply squeeze abroad, exporters said.
    They could not quantify how much coffee has been delayed
but said at least 40 pct of coffee exports are carried by
Brazilian ships and movement of foreign vessels has also been
disrupted by port congestion caused by the strike.
    A series of labor disputes and bad weather has meant
Brazil's coffee exports have been running at an average two
weeks behind schedule since the start of the year, one source
added.
    By the end of February shipments had fallen 800,000 bags
behind registrations, leaving around 2.4 mln bags to be shipped
during March. By March 10 only 230,000 bags had been shipped,
the sources said.
    Given Brazil's port loading capacity of around 100,000 bags
a day, even if normal operations were resumed immediately and
not interrupted by bad weather, some March registered coffee
will inevitably be shipped during April, they added.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3973>
The senior Republican on the U.S.
Senate Agriculture Committee, Richard Lugar of Indiana, called
for repeal of the cargo preference law that aids the American
shipping industry but which he said hurts farmers.
    "Cargo preference is a costly special interest operated at
the expense of American farmers and dockworkers," Lugar said in
signing on as a co-sponsor or cargo preference repeal
legislation.
    The law requires shipment of U.S. goods on American ships
rather than foreign vessels which are less costly.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4049>
International efforts to redirect Japan's
export-driven economy toward domestic consumption face heavy
going if the country's largest defence contractor and world's
biggest shipbuilder is anything to go by.
    Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd &lt;MITH.T> (MHI), which began
making ships and iron goods for Japan's military rulers 130
years ago, is responding to the strong yen by redoubling its
efforts to maintain its share of export markets.
    "If we sell the best quality and the cheapest products,
everyone will buy them," MHI president Yotaro Iida said.
    Although two of MHI's main businesses, shipbuilding and
power plant construction, have been hit hard by the yen's 40
pct rise against the dollar, the company has no plans to
abandon them, Iida told Reuters in an interview.
    Its other big activity, aircraft component manufacture, has
performed so well that MHI now accounts for half of the money
Tokyo spends on defence procurement each year.
    "We have made the utmost efforts among the world's
manufacturers to improve productivity," he said. "You may be
surprised if you come to see our plants. The outside is old but
the inside is ultra-modern, with robots and computers."
    Securities analysts at major securities houses agreed that
MHI has pared costs more quickly than its competitors. The
company has slashed its workforce to 47,000 from 86,000 in
1976.
    Despite its cost-cutting, MHI expects profits to drop 40
pct to 30 billion yen in the current fiscal year ending March
31, from 1985/86's record 50.14 billion.
    And that includes gains from the sale of MHI's stake in
Mitsubishi Motors Corp &lt;MIMT.T> for 49 billion yen.
    Iida is optimistic about the future, however. He said a
resurgence of demand from the Middle East following the recent
recovery in oil prices coupled with persistent demand for power
plants in developing countries will help MHI restore its
exports-to-sales ratio to the past decade's average of 30 pct.
    MHI's exports-to-sales ratio fell to 25.9 pct in the
half-year ended last September, from 35 to 36 pct five years
ago.
    China is the most promising market, although MHI also
considers other non-oil-producing developing countries as major
customers.
    "Our customers are all seen as being in trouble due to a
lack of foreign currency," Iida said. But he added that he felt
MHI could sell to those markets with Japanese government
financial support.
    It can also finance the plants itself and recover its
investment through product sales, a strategy Iida said could
prove popular in the future.
    In shipping, MHI is fighting back against low-priced South
Korean competition by building more technologically advanced
carriers to carry liquefied natural gas and other products
difficult to transport.
    Shipbuilders Association officials told Reuters MHI is the
world's largest shipbuilder in terms of orders and capacity.
    Domestically, MHI is involved in 12 national projects,
including development of nuclear fusion reactors and launch
vehicles for man-made satellites.
    It has been the biggest contractor for the Japan Defence
Agency's F-15 and F-14 jet fighters and missiles, although all
of these have been built under licence from U.S. Firms.
    MHI is now heading up five Japanese companies seeking to
develop the country's own fighter plane to replace the
currently used F-1 support fighters in the late 1990s.
    Military experts said Washington is putting strong pressure
on Tokyo to buy a U.S. Plane, either the McDonnell Douglas Corp
F-18 or General Dynamics Corp F-16, to reduce Japan's huge
trade surplus with the U.S.
    "It might be a good idea to jointly produce planes with U.S.
Makers as Japan is supported by the U.S. Defence umbrella," Iida
said.
    MHI also plans to cooperate with the U.S. In its Strategic
Defence Initiative space defence program by participating in
the project when it moves from the research stage, he said.
    The U.S. Has been seeking Japan's technological support.
    In fiscal 1985/86, aircraft accounted for 17.1 pct of MHI's
sales, shipbuilding 17 pct and power plants 27.9 pct. Iida said
the ideal ratio is power plants 30 pct, aircraft and special
vehicles 25 pct and shipbuilding 15 pct.
    As for the remaining 30 pct, Iida said he wanted to shift
the domestic focus away from heavy machinery sold to
manufacturers and towards household goods, but he declined to
specify which products.
    "By the end of this year, you may find our brand name on
your daily products, although this does not mean we will run
away from our mainstream business," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4051>
Cargo handling resumed at
Bangladesh's Chittagong port today after 7,000 workers ended
their three day walk-out triggered by a pay dispute, port
officials said.
    Loading and unloading of 14 ships stranded by the strike
started this morning and will be completed as quickly as
possible, they said.
    The strikers returned to work after an agreement was
reached last night between port authorities and the Port
Workers Association, they said without giving details.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4061>
Striking seamen said they would
offer their collective resignation rather than end their
13-day-old national strike on management's terms.
    The seamen said they were spurred to their decision after
marines occupied the ship Docemarte in Santos harbour Tuesday
night. They said seamen on the vessel were being forced to work
under duress.
    President Jose Sarney's government despatched troops to
Brazil's ports and oil installations on Tuesday.
    Seamen in Santos, Brazil's main port, are in defiant mood.
One of their leaders, Orlando dos Santos, told Reuters that
most of the 1,100 seamen in the port offered their resignations
on Wednesday. The national strike headquarters in Rio de
Janeiro said seamen were offering to resign in all the
country's main ports.
    The strike by 40,000 seamen comes as Brazil faces a serious
debt crisis brought on by a sharp deterioration in its trade
balance. The country needs all the foreign exchange it can get,
and shipowners have been quick to denounce seamen for the harm
the strike is doing to exports.
    An advertisement placed in the newspapers by the Shipowners
Association read, "The seamen's strike is illegal, irrational
and unpatriotic."
    The seamen respond that they cannot live on their present
salaries. According to officical pay lists available in the
union's office, the basic pay for ordinary seamen is 1,977
cruzados a month, while various allowances can bring their
total pay up to 4,000 cruzados a month.
    At the other end of the scale, captains earn 7,993 cruzados
a month basic pay, which is brought up to 15,229 cruzados with
allowances. 
    "Brazil's seamen are the second worst paid in the world,
after Ghana's," dos Santos said. He said the seamen had not
received a pay increase since February 1986, and prices have
doubled since then with the collapse of the government's
Cruzado Plan price freeze.
    Talks in Rio de Janeiro Wednesday involving Labour Minister
Almir Pazzionotto, seamen and employers failed to resolve the
dispute. The seamen are demanding pay raises of about 200 pct
but have been offered less than half that.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4171>
Iran attacked the Saudi Arabian
supertanker Arabian Sea off the United Arab Emirates last night
but the vessel was able to proceed after the incident, Lloyds
Shipping Intelligence reported.
    The 315,695-dwt Arabian Sea had set sail on Tuesday after
loading oil at the Saudi port of Ras Tannurah. Lloyds said the
attack occurred at about 2200 hrs local time (1800 GMT).
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4203>
The Panamanian bulk carrier Juvena is
still aground outside Tartous, Syria, despite discharging 6,400
tons of its 39,000-ton cargo of wheat, and water has entered
the engine-room due to a crack in the vessel bottom, Lloyds
Shipping Intelligence Service said.
    The Juvena, 53,351 tonnes dw, ran aground outside Tartous
port basin breakwater on February 25 in heavy weather and rough
seas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4209>
Dutch shipping and transport group
PHS Van Ommeren NV &lt;OMMN.AS> said it has taken over a small
Dutch gas container firm as a first step in establishing a
world-wide gas container organisation.
    The firm, Liquid and Gas Transport BV (LGT), employs 10
people and has a fleet of 200 gas containers.
    Van Ommeren will shortly open an office in Singapore and
expand its facilities in Houston to establish the gas container
network.
    REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4328>
The Turkish ore/bulk/oil vessel Obo
Engin, 78,078 tonnes dwt, had an explosion in its boiler
yesterday, Lloyds shipping Intelligence Service reported.
    The vessel has retained some power and yesterday evening
was in position Lat. 25 57 N., Long. 75 06 W. It is diverting
to Jacksonville, Florida, with its cargo of 58,000 tons of
coal.
   The vessel was bound for Iskenderun, Turkey from Lake
Charles.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4345>
The St Lawrence Seaway and the Welland
Canal linking Lakes Erie and Ontario were expected to open as
scheduled on March 31 and April 1, respectively, a St Lawrence
Seaway official said.
    The entire Seaway is already free of ice due to the mild
Winter and could be open for navigation today, "but there
doesn't seem to be enough demand from shipping companies to
warrant an early opening," the Canadian official said.
    Repairs are continuing at a stepped up pace on the Welland
Canal and should be completed by the April 1 start-up date, she
added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4617>
Two small shipping companies have
reached a pay deal with striking seamen, but union leaders said
most of Brazil's 40,000 seamen were still on strike.
    A union spokesman in Rio de Janeiro said the seamen had
accepted a 120 pct pay offer from the companies, Globo and
Flumar, which have less than 200 employees each.
    The two-week strike comes as Brazil faces a debt crisis and
is delaying exports badly needed to earn foreign exchange.
    Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto said the government will
not force a settlement of the strike, which was ruled illegal
last Friday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4640>
Japanese shipbuilders have applied to the
state's Fair Trade Commission to form a cartel to restrict
tonnage built to about half of total capacity for the year
starting April 1, officials of the Shipbuilders Association of
Japan said.
    Under the plan, 33 yards capable of building ships of more
than 10,000 gross tons will curtail operations to three mln
compensated gross registered tonnes (CGRT) a year against
capacity of about six mln CGRT.
    The Transport Ministry estimates new orders at 3.3 mln CGRT
in the year to March 1988 and 3.1 mln the following year.
    The industry has curtailed production due to oversupply
nearly every year since 1977/78, under cartel or Transport
Ministry guidelines. The latest guidelines call for a ceiling
of four mln CGRT in the year to March 31.
    The cartels, self-imposed and self-regulated, are not
legally binding, but industry finds it in its own interest to
stick to them.
    The slowdown in orders has been caused by the strong yen
and a protracted worldwide shipbuilding slump.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4711>
Two small shipping companies have
reached a pay deal with striking seamen, but union leaders said
most of Brazil's 40,000 seamen were still on strike.
    A union spokesman in Rio de Janeiro said the seamen had
accepted a 120 pct pay offer from the companies, Globo and
Flumar, which have less than 200 employees each.
    The two-week strike comes as Brazil faces a debt crisis and
is delaying exports badly needed to earn foreign exchange.
    Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto said the government will
not force a settlement of the strike, which was ruled illegal
last Friday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4735>
Employers in Rotterdam port's
strike-hit general cargo sector have been served with an
injunction until May 7 preventing them from continuing with
plans for 350 redundancies this year, an employers'
organisation spokesman said.
    An Amsterdam court yesterday ruled there had been a legal
fault in the employers' redundancy procedure.
    The employers' spokesman said they were likely to restart
the redundancy procedure afresh next week in an attempt to
pre-empt the May 7 final court ruling.
    Port and transport union representative Paul Rosenmuller
described the court ruling as a victory for the union, but
added there was still a long way to go before the dispute that
has hit the general cargo sector for the past eight weeks was
resolved.
    Rosenmuller said there would be a meeting of the sector's
4,000 workers this afternoon to decide on further action in the
campaign of lightning strikes that began on January 19 in
protest at planned redundancies of 800, starting with 350 this
year.
    The employers said there were no immediate plans for
meetings with the union either on the proposed redundancies or
on a new work practice agreement in the sector.
    Meanwhile, discussions on a new work agreement in the
port's grain sector, due to resume next week, are stalemated,
although agreement could be close in the coal and ore sector,
the employers' spokesman added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4739>
Harbour workers said they will
strike for 24 hours on Monday, effectively closing all New
Zealand's ports.
    The strike is over deadlocked wage negotiations.
    A Harbour Employees Workers' Union spokesman told reporters
there will be no ship movements in and out of ports from
midnight on Sunday (1200 hrs GMT March 15).
    There will be no loading or unloading involving harbour
board workers and the Cook Strait ferries, which provide a
vital link between New Zealand's North and South Islands, will
not run, he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4740>
Two small shipping companies reached
a pay deal with striking seamen late yesterday, but union
leaders said most of Brazil's 40,000 seamen were still on
strike.
    A union spokesman in Rio de Janeiro said the seamen had
accepted a 120 pct pay raise offer from the companies, Globo
and Flumar, which have less than 200 employees each.
    The two-week strike comes as Brazil faces a debt crisis and
is delaying exports badly needed to earn foreign exchange.
    Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto said the government will
not force a settlement of the strike, which was ruled illegal
last Friday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4778>
About 220 men in Rotterdam port's
grain sector stopped work this afternoon in an unofficial
protest at the slow progress of negotiations over a new work
practice agreement, a spokesman for the port and transport
union FNV said.
    Negotiations between the union and employers, which are due
to resume early next week, are currently stalemated with the
union refusing to accept sweeping changes in working hours and
practices in return for a 1.5 pct pay increase.
    The FNV spokesman said the action did not yet have official
backing, but added that next week matters might be different.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4781>
Dutch port and transport union, FNV,
has called off the strikes against planned redundancies that
have hit Rotterdam port's general cargo sector for the past
eight weeks, strike leader Paul Rosenmuller told a mass
meeting.
    The decision followed yesterday's ruling by an Amsterdam
court preventing the sector's employers continuing with current
plans for 350 redundancies this year until the court sits again
on May 7, Rosenmuller told a meeting of the general cargo
sector's 4,000 workers today.
    The court ruled the employers had made a mistake in the
complicated legal procedure for obtaining official permission
for the redundancies, and therefore could not proceed.
    "There is no need to continue the strikes for the moment now
the immediate pressure of redundancies has been lifted,"
Rosenmuller said.
    But he added that the strikes, which began on January 19 in
protest against plans for 800 redundancies by 1990, could
resume at any time before May 7 if the employers made any moves
to re-apply for permission for the redundancies.
    SVZ labour relations manager Gerrard Zeebregts said they
would be meeting their lawyers today with a view to re-applying
for this permission next week in the hope of gaining approval
for the redundancies within a month.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4845>
The Port of Singapore Authority (PSA)
will spend 1.2 billion dlrs to develop port facilities and
cargo-handling equipment over the next five years,
Communications Minister Yeo Ning Hong told parliament.
    Yeo said the improvements were needed to cope with an
expected growth of ship tonnage and cargo handled by the port,
but gave no further details.
    The PSA handled 529 mln gross-registered tonnes of cargo in
1985, according to the latest available statistics from the
port authority.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4953>
Brazil's labour troubles eased a
little today as the authorities announced they were withdrawing
troops from the country's main oil installations occupied three
days ago.
    The troops went in at the request of the state-oil company
Petrobras because of the threat of a strike by 55,000 oil
industry employees.
    Petrobras said in a statement today it had requested the
withdrawal of the troops. The situation in the refineries was
calm, it said, and the employees had indicated their
willingness to negotiate a pay deal.
    A national seamen's strike, however, continued and marines
remained in the country's main ports. The marines were
despatched to the ports after the seamen's strike, now two
weeks old, was ruled illegal last Friday.
    A spokesman at the national strike headquarters in Rio de
Janeiro said today a total of l63 ships were strike-bound, 135
in Brazil and 28 in foreign ports.
    Yesterday two small companies specialised in the transport
of chemicals, Global and Flumar, struck a pay accord with their
seamen who have secured a 120 pct increase.
    Brazilian newspapers today hailed these agreements as a
sign that the national strike could soon come to an end.
    Both companies employ fewer than 200 seamen and union
leaders said the vast majority of Brazil's 40,000 seamen were
still on strike.
    The threat of a stoppage by oil industry employees appeared
today to be receding. Petrobras said in its statement that the
company would meet union leaders for pay talks in Rio de
Janeiro next Wednesday.
    Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto would act as a mediator.
    Besides industrial troubles, there has also been
considerable unrest this week in the agricultural sector.
    On Tuesday hundreds of thousands of farmers held rallies
throughout the country to protest against high interest rates.
    Television reports showed some of these protests still
continuing today, with farmers blockading banks with their
vehicles in several towns in the states of Sao Paulo and
Parana.
    The strikes in Brazil come as the government is trying to
extricate itself from a serious debt crisis brought on by a
deterioration in its trade balance.
    On February 20 President Jose Sarney announced that Brazil
was suspending interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of debt to
private banks.
    Because of the seamen strike exports are being delayed and
the country is losing badly needed foreign exchange.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5154>
Iran has deployed about six large
missiles near the Strait of Hormuz which increase the threat to
shipping in the Gulf, the New York Times said.
    The paper quoted U.S. Intelligence sources as saying the
missiles appeared to be of a Chinese design known as HY-2 which
is based on the Soviet SSN2 or Styx missile.
    Styx missiles have a range of up to 50 miles.
    It said the missiles had been deployed at two sites and
quoted a naval analyst as saying they could be used to sink a
supertanker and block the Strait of Hormuz.
    Missiles now used by Iran had only a fraction of the
explosive power of the Styx and could sink a supertanker only
with a lucky hit, the paper said. None of the new missiles had
been fired yet, it added.
    The CBS television network reported on Friday that Iran had
installed new missiles along the Gulf and said Washington had
warned Tehran not to use them against civilian shipping.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5156>
Brazilian bank workers voted
to launch a nationwide strike this month, compounding labour
unrest arising from the failure of the government's
anti-inflation plan.
    At a rally in this city, about 100 km northwest of Sao
Paulo, about 5,000 bank workers voted to strike on March 24
unless their demand for 100 pct pay rises is met.
    Wilson Gomes de Moura, president of the national
confederation which groups the bank employees' 152 unions
representing 700,000 workers, told Reuters the indefinite
stoppage would affect all banks.
    The vote came as a stoppage by seamen entered its third
week and as 55,000 oil workers threatened action against the
state-owned petroleum company Petrobras.
    The government ordered thousands of troops into the
refineries on Tuesday to forestall any occupation, but the
troops were removed yesterday.
    Petrobras said it had requested their withdrawal because
the refineries were calm and oil workers had indicated their
willingess to negotiate next Wednesday. The government has also
sent marines into the main ports.
    A spokesman at strike headquarters for the seamen in Rio de
Janeiro said unions were studying an offer by private
shipowners for a 120 pct pay rise.
    Seamen employed by two small companies have already
accepted a 120 pct pay rise and returned to work, as have about
5,000 seamen employed by Petrobras.
    Last week also saw widespread protests by hundreds of
thousands of farmers over what they see as unfairly high
interest rates charged by banks.
    According to official estimates, prices rose by more than
33 pct in the first two months of this year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5191>
Major tanker operator, Japan Line Ltd
&lt;JLIT.T>, is selling 20 VLCCs and several bulk carriers for
scrap or further trading, industry sources said.
    The tanker disposals include Japan Orchid (231,722 dwt),
Japan Lupinus (233,641 dwt), Sovereign (233,313 dwt), Rosebay
(274,531 dwt), Saffron (268,038 dwt) and Cattleya (267,807
dwt), all of which have been reported on the London sale and
purchase market, they said, but refused to give further
details.
    Japan Line officials declined to comment.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5292>
Indonesia will build a crude palm oil
terminal at a new port on Batam island, south of Singapore,
Research and Technology Minister Yusuf Habibie said.
    The terminal will be able to handle 2.1 mln tonnes of crude
palm oil from new plantations in northern Sumatra and western
Kalimantan (Borneo), he said.
    A tender for engineering work on the Asia Port project will
be offered mid-year. Habibie did not say when the terminal was
expected to be operational.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5330>
Brazilian bank workers voted
to launch a nationwide strike this month, compounding labour
unrest arising from the failure of the government's
anti-inflation plan.
    At a rally in this city, about 100 km northwest of Sao
Paulo, about 5,000 bank workers voted to strike on March 24
unless their demand for 100 pct pay rises is met.
    Wilson Gomes de Moura, president of the national
confederation which groups the bank employees' 152 unions
representing 700,000 workers, told Reuters the indefinite
stoppage would affect all banks.
    The vote came as a stoppage by seamen entered its third
week and as 55,000 oil workers threatened action against the
state-owned petroleum company Petrobras.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5499>
Members of the Baltic International
Freight Futures Exchange (BIFFEX) are to be balloted at the end
of this week on whether it will merge with the London Commodity
Exchange or come under a new umbrella of Baltic futures
exchanges, a BIFFEX official said.
    The final decision will be left with the BIFFEX board,
which will meet at the end of this month, he said.
    Last week three exchanges currently trading on the Baltic
Exchange, the London Potato Futures Association, the GAFTA Soya
Bean Meal Futures Association and the London Meat Futures
Exchange, instructed legal advisers to implement a merger.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5542>
Norway's parliament has approved an
extensive trade ban against South Africa but left shipowners a
key loophole through which controversial oil shipments on
Norwegian tankers may continue, government officials said.
    The unilateral boycott, proposed by Norway's minority
Labour government, gives domestic companies until late
September to cut remaining trade ties with South Africa and
Namibia.
    "The legislation discussed today must not be seen as an
isolated measure, but as a step in an international process,"
Norway's foreign minister Thorvald Stoltenberg told parliament.
    Government officials said they hope the move will intensify
international pressure against the Pretoria regime's apartheid
policies. Sweden, in a similar move last week, promised to halt
all trade with South Africa by October.
    Norway's boycott, although forbidding crude oil shipments
to South Africa on Norwegian-owned tankers, makes an important
exception for ships whose final destination is decided while
they are at sea.
    Oil cargoes are often resold by trades after loading,
making it difficult for shipowners to know their ships' final
port at the start of a voyage.
    Critics said the bill leaves the door open for continued
oil shipments to South Africa. They called for stricter
sanctions to stop all Norwegian shipping to South Africa.
    Norwegian tankers supplied South Africa with about 30 pct
of its crude imports during the early 1980s, but the trade has
dropped sharply to just one cargo in the last three months,
trade ministry officials said.
    The latest trade figures show Norwegian imports from South
Africa dropped 36 pct to 160 mln crowns during the first eight
months of 1986, while exports plunged 52 pct to 265 mln crowns
from the year-ago figure.
    "Many would say that the law has already had its effect
because of the dramatic drop in trade between South African and
Norway," Foreign Ministry spokesman Per Paust told Reuters.
    "Norwegian business at an early stage started restructuring
its relations with South Africa in anticipation of the law.
    "No one has said the boycott will have a profound effect on
international trade with South Africa, but it is an important
political statement by the Norwegian government," he said.
    The Oslo government said it will review the effects of the
ban on Norwegian industry after two years and may propose
amendments if industry can show it is hurt by the law.
    Norwegian imports from South Africa are limited mainly to
high-grade manganese and coppernickle ores used in it
ferro-alloys and light metals industries.
    Metals manufacturers estimate some 2,000 jobs could be
affected by the boycott is suitable replacements for these ores
are not found.
    The legislation now goes on to the upper house for formal
ratification later this week, parliamentarians said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5553>
Gotaas-Larsen Shipping Corp
said it had exercised an option to build a fifth in a series of
crude oil carriers to be constructed by &lt;Daewoo Shipbuilding
and Heavy Machinery Ltd> in South Korea.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5630>
Pacific Resources Inc said it has
installed a CALM (Catenary Anchor Leg Mooring) single-point
mooring terminal off the southwest coast of Oahu at its
Hawaiian Independent Refinery at a cost of 3.5 mln dlrs.
    The system transfers crude and fuel oils from tankers to
the refinery's tank farm and carries refined products to ships
for export, PRI said.
    Company chairman Robert G. Reed said the new mooring system
will permit 24-hour service in most kinds of weather and will
reduce ship turnaround time. He said the mooring is the first
of its kind in the U.S.
    The new system can accomodate vessels up to 150,000
deadweight tons, or one mln barrels of cargo, PRI said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5734>
Harbour workers returned to work
this morning after a strike in support of pay claims closed New
Zealand's 15 ports for 24 hours yesterday.
    But the Harbour Workers Union told reporters the pay
dispute is not settled and the union's national executive will
meet here tomorrow to decide its next moves.
    "Obviously we will be considering further industrial action,"
Union secretary Ross Wilson said in a radio interview.
    The union rejects employers offers of a 7.5 pct pay rise
over 15 months. It wants 7.0 pct over 12 months.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5818>
New foreign shipbuilding orders received
by Japanese yards in February rose to six vessels totalling
329,999 gross tons from three ships of 79,499 tons in January,
the Japan Ship Exporters Association said.
    This compared with six ships of 125,150 gross tons a year
earlier, an association official said.
    The backlog of orders at end-February was 157 ships of 4.41
mln gross tons against 161 ships of 4.39 mln a month earlier
and 265 vessels of 6.81 mln a year earlier, an association
official said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5852>
Norway's parliament has approved an
extensive trade ban against South Africa but left shipowners a
key loophole through which controversial oil shipments on
Norwegian tankers may continue, government officials said.
    The unilateral boycott gives domestic companies until late
September to cut trade ties with South Africa and Namibia.
    Although forbidding crude oil shipments to South Africa on
Norwegian-owned tankers, the boycott makes a crucial exception
for ships whose final destination is decided while at sea. As
oil cargoes are often resold after loading, critics said the
door will be left open for continued shipments to South Africa.
    Norwegian tankers supplied South Africa with about 30 pct
of its crude oil imports during the early 1980s, but the trade
has dropped sharply to just one cargo in the last three months,
trade ministry officials said.
    The latest trade figures show Norwegian imports from South
Africa dropped 36 pct to 160 mln crowns during the first eight
months of 1986, while exports plunged 52 pct to 265 mln crowns
from the year-ago figure.
    The boycott legislation now goes to the upper house for
formal ratification later this week, parliamentarians said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5866>
A Cypriot tanker was set ablaze in the
Persian Gulf yesterday after an Iranian gunboat fired missiles
at it, shipping sources quoting reports from Japanese tankers
said today.
    No casualties were seen and the tanker Pivot, laden with
crude oil, was towed towards Dubai by tugs after they put out
the fire, the sources said.
    Iranian gunboats usually check a ship's nationality and
cargo before attacking but the Pivot was hit near Bu Musa
island without warning, they added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5870>
Employers in Rotterdam's troubled
general cargo sector have decided to restart stalled redundancy
procedures within a week, employers' organisation labour
relations manager Gerard Zeebregts told Reuters.
    Port and transport union spokesman Bert Duim said the
employers' decision would not lead to the immediate resumption
of eight weeks of strikes in the sector.
    The strike action was called off on Friday after an interim
court injunction against the employers' plans for 350
redundancies this year.
    A court in Amsterdam ruled last week the employers had made
an error in the complicated procedure for obtaining permission
for the redundancies and therefore could not proceed until a
final ruling on May 7.
    Zeebregts said the initiation of new procedure might well
take up to two months, but the employers were not prepared
simply to sit and wait for the May 7 court ruling with the
chance they would have to start all over again in any case.
    "We cannot afford not to continue with our plans. The
strikes have already cost a lot of money and damaged business,
and further delays would do even more damage," Zeebregts said.
    The campaign of lightning strikes in the port's general
cargo sector began on January 19 in protest at employers' plans
for 800 redundancies from the sector's 4,000 strong workforce
by 1990, starting with 350 this year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6404>
Iraq said its warplanes hit two ships
off the Iranian coast in attacks last night and early today.
    The planes "dealt accurate and effective blows to both
maritime targets before they returned safely to base," a
military spokesman told the Iraqi new agency INA.
    There was no immediate confirmation of the attacks from
Persian Gulf shipping sources.
    The last confirmed Iraqi attack on shipping was on March 8,
when an Iranian tanker was hit by a missile south of Iran's
Kharg island oil export terminal.
    Gulf shipping sources yesterday reported an Iranian warship
had set the Cypriot supertanker Pivot on fire with a missile.
    They said there were no injuries on board and the ship
headed for the Gulf Emirate of Fujairah under its own power
after the fire was put out.
    The Pivot was the 18th ship hit this year in the maritime
extension of the 6-1/2 year-old Iran-Iraq war.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6436>
Some 10 Indian ships have been held up
at Calcutta port after four days of industrial action by local
seamen, a spokesman for the shipowners' association INSA said.
    The dispute has prevented local crewmen signing on and off,
but has not affected foreign ships with international crews
docking at Calcutta, which exports tea and jute and imports
machinery, crude oil and petroleum products, the spokesman
said.
    Foreign ships may also suffer if dock workers join the
action, he said. The Shipping Corporation of India (SCI) has
asked its ships to avoid the port until the dispute is over,
National Union of Seafarers in India president Leo Barnes said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6541>
Japan's ailing shipbuilding industry
plans to refloat itself in a few years from the twin rocks of
recession and a strong yen through capacity and workforce cuts
and greater use of computers, industry sources told Reuters.
    The salvage measures, which include a government-sponsored
rationalisation program, are aimed at clawing back some of the
market which Japan, the world leader, has lost to South Korea
through currency and labour cost disadvantages, they said.
    The sources said South Korea's yards are now some 35 pct
more competitive than Japan's due to such factors.
    The government plans to help the industry shed 20 pct of
current capacity within two years through mergers and
regrouping under legislation put before Parliament this month
and likely to be approved by May or June, the sources said.
    They said from September a semi-government body will assure
repayment of about 50 billion yen in liabilities incurred
through job losses and the sale of excess capacity, and another
30 billion for buying unneeded land and equipment.
    Last Friday, the Shipbuilders Association of Japan applied
to the Fair Trade Commission to form a cartel to slash tonnage
built to about half of total capacity for a year from April 1.
    The commission has held several hearings with the industry
and approval should be given this month, the sources said.
    A clampdown on output over one or two years combined with a
planned cost-cutting and streamlining program and state support
should help Japanese yards recover their international
competitiveness, they said.
    Under the cartel proposals, 33 yards each capable of
building ships of more than 10,000 gross tonnes would build a
maximum of three mln compensated gross registered tonnes (CGRT)
in 1987/88. This is about half of total capacity.
    This will ease the cut-throat competition which forced most
yards to sign orders below cost, the sources said.
    The industry is likely to seek to renew the cartel for
1988/89 as the Transport Ministry sees new orders falling to
3.1 mln CGRT in 1988/89 from 3.3 mln in 1987/88, they said.
    The rationalisation program includes a cut of 20,000 to
30,000 of the estimated 100,000 workers in the industry between
1986 and 1989.
    Japanese yards topped world order books at end-December,
followed by South Korea and Taiwan, according to Lloyd's
Register of Shipping.
    However, falling orders and declining international
competitiveness due to the strong yen led to heavy losses in
the industry, the sources said.
    Four of Japan's six major heavy machinery and shipbuilding
companies reported current deficits in the first half of the
year to March 31 and five of them are expected to report
current deficits for the whole of 1986/7, they said.
    The shipbuilding companies' streamlining program will raise
productivity to compete with South Korean yards which have also
been hard hit by declining orders and low ship prices in recnt
years, the sources said.
    In Japan, no single yard leads the industry, resulting in
fierce competition and slow progress in reducing capacity. The
two largest firms -- Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd &lt;MITH.T>
and Ishikawajima-Harima Heavy Industries Co Ltd &lt;JIMA.T> --
account for only 30 pct of ships built, the sources said.
    "World shipowners hope Japanese yards can manage to ride out
the recession as their technology is the best in the world,"
said an official at a major Japanese shipping company.
    The Japanese merchant fleet, the largest after Liberia's,
has no intention of shifting to other countries to buy ships,
and this will encourage Japanese yards, the sources said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6588>
Recent purchases of U.S. corn by the
Soviet Union have skewed the domestic cash market by increasing
the price difference between the premium price paid at the Gulf
export point and interior levels, cash grain dealers said.
    Many dealers expect the USDA will act soon to reduce the
cash price premium at the Gulf versus the interior -- which a
dealer in Davenport, Iowa, said was roughly 20 pct wider than
normal for this time of year at 25 cents a bushel -- by making
it worthwhile for farmers to move grain.
    By lowering ASCS county posted prices for corn, the USDA
could encourage farmers to engage in PIK and roll corn sales,
where PIK certificates are used to redeem corn stored under the
government price support loan program and then marketed.
    If the USDA acts soon, as many dealers expect, the movement
would break the Gulf corn basis.
    "The USDA has been using the Gulf price to determine county
posted prices," one dealer said. "It should be taking the
average of the Gulf price and the price in Kansas City," which
would more closely reflect the lower prices in the interior
Midwest.
    "But we don't know when they might do it," an Ohio dealer
said, which has created uncertainty in the market.
    The USDA started the PIK certificate program in an effort
to free up surplus grain that otherwise would be forfeited to
the government and remain off the market and in storage.
    Yesterday, USDA issued a report showing that only slightly
more than 50 pct of the 3.85 billion dlrs in PIK certificates
it has issued to farmers (in lieu of cash payments) had to date
been exchanged for grain.
    With several billion dlrs worth of additional PIK
certificates scheduled to be issued in the coming months, the
USDA would be well advised to encourage the exchange for grain
by adjusting the ASCS prices, cash grain dealers said.
    A byproduct of the Soviet buying has been a sharp rise in
barge freight costs quoted for carrying grain from the Midwest
to the export terminals, cash dealers said.
    Freight from upper areas of the Mississippi have risen
nearly 50 pct in the past two weeks to over 150 pct of the
original tariff price. The mild winter and early reopening of
the mid-Mississippi river this spring have also encouraged the
firmer trend in barge freight, dealers noted.
    The higher transportation costs have served to depress
interior corn basis levels, squeezing the margins obtained by
the elevators feeding the Gulf export market as well as
discouraging farmer marketings, they said.
    "The Gulf market overreacted to the Soviet buying reports,"
which indicate the USSR has booked over two and perhaps as much
as 4.0 mln tonnes of U.S. corn, one Midwest cash grain trader
said.
    But dealers anticipate that once the rumors subside,
freight rates will settle back down because of the overall
surplus of barges on the Midwest river system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6652>
Iraq said its warplanes had hit a
vessel in the Gulf off the Iranian coast today, the third in
the past 24 hours.
    A military spokesman told the Iraqi news agency INA the
latest attack was at 1250 GMT. It earlier reported strikes at
0650 GMT and at 1930 GMT last night. The planes "dealt accurate
and effective blows" to the targets and returned safely to base.
    There was no immediate confirmation of the attacks from
Gulf shipping sources. The last confirmed Iraqi attack was on
on March 8, when an Iranian tanker was hit by a missile south
of Iran's Kharg island oil export terminal.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6714>
Shell Canada Ltd said its Shell Canada
Products Ltd unit will sell three tankers, effective April one,
1987, to &lt;Socanav Inc>.
    Terms were not disclosed.
    Shell also said it will contract exclusively from Socanav
normal marine distribution requirements for domestic markets,
with some exceptions, for an initial 10-year period.
    Shell also said its Shell Canadian Tankers Ltd unit will
lay off 13 employees and that Socanav will offer jobs to 41
employees.
   The three Shell vessels are Lakeshell, Eastern Shell and
Northern Shell, which range in size from 6,000 to 10,000
tonnes, Shell said.
   Shell Canada is 72 pct owned by Royal Dutch/Shell Group
&lt;RD>.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6941>
The U.S. Departments of Agriculture
and Transportation are close to agreement on how to fund the
increasing share of food aid to be shipped on U.S. flag vessels
under a 1985 farm bill provision on cargo preference.
    Melvin Sims, USDA's general sales manager told a House
Agriculture Appropriations subcommittee hearing that the two
departments are negotiating a "memorandum of understanding" on
cargo preference.
    Under a 1985 farm bill provision, the percentage of food
aid shipments carried on U.S. flag vessels was to gradually
increase over three years to 75 pct in 1988. The increased cost
of using U.S. vessels was to be funded by the Transportation
Department instead of USDA. However, USDA officials said
Transportation has so far contributed no money.
    The agreement between USDA and Transportation is expected
to resolve the matter, USDA officials said.
    Tom Kay, administrator of the USDA's Foreign Agricultural
Service said yesterday the requirement that more food aid
shipments be carried on U.S. vessels has been difficult to
meet.
    "As the tonnage (required under cargo preference) goes up,
its going to be harder and harder to meet," Kay said.
    Two farm state Congressmen, Pat Roberts (R-Kan.) and Glenn
English (D-Okla.) said cargo preference makes U.S. farm export
programs more costly and the program should be eliminated.
    In the past, farm interests opposed to cargo preference
have been defeated in Congress by the maritime interests who
view cargo preference as vital to the U.S. shipping fleet.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7103>
Current interest by Soviet charterers in
taking Panamax vessels on timecharter, mainly from the U.S. To
carry grain, is seen as the chief factor behind the recent
surge in values on the Baltic International Freight Futures
Exchange (BIFFEX), dealers said.
    Futures soared through the 1,000 points barrier today for
the first time in the spot position since the market opened in
May 1985. However, the market tends to be nervous, with values
some 100 points above the Baltic Freight Index, which is
calculated on spot physical rates.
    No specific figure has been put for Soviet bookings but
they have been sufficient to drain Panamax tonnage (about
50,000 to 65,000 tonnes dw) from the U.S. Gulf which would
normally operate on the trip to Japan, dealers said.
    "It appears that the Chernobyl disaster had a worse effect
on its (the Soviet) grain harvest than reported," one said.
    Freight rates on the Gulf/Japan grain route have
subsequently been the main beneficiary of current chartering
conditions, with very few, if any, Panamax sized ships left for
the remainder of this month in the Gulf. Rates have risen
steadily for vessels loading next month.
    Dealers said there is even talk that owners are considering
taking older vessels out of lay-up to meet current demand.
    Sentiment has also been aided by suggestions that Chinese
operators may be in the market for similar timecharter business
later in the year, they said.
    They anticipate this would appear around June and it has
prompted keen demand in the July BIFFEX contract, despite it
normally being a slack time in the shipping year.
    Market sentiment has fluctuated in recent weeks. Rates
turned down as an earlier rise in bunker prices, which had
supported the market at the start of the year, faltered but
then recovered on the reported Soviet interest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7119>
An accord is in sight in Brazil's
20-day-old national seamen's strike, which has seriously
delayed exports, a union official said.
    The official, speaking from strike headquarters in Rio de
Janeiro, said up to 30,000 of Brazil's 40,000 seamen were still
on strike.
    He said the others had returned to work over the last week,
accepting pay offers of 120 pct from four private companies and
from the Frota Nacional de Petroleiros (Fronape), part of the
state-owned oil company Petrobras.
    The association grouping private shipowners, Syndarma, has
also offered 120 pct but talks have so far been deadlocked over
payment for overtime.
    The union official said he believed this issue would be
resolved shortly.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7196>
Panama Canal toll charges will not rise
in the year to end-September 1988, despite last October's
landslide which dumped 0.5 mln cubic yards of debris into the
waterway, Canal Commission Administrator Dennis McAuliffe said.
    He told a press conference that in confirming the
Commission's earlier announcement of unchanged tolls for 1988,
he was not necessarily implying there would be a rise in 1989.
    The canal would probably make a five to six mln dlr loss in
the current financial year but this could be carried over and
met from next year's revenues.
    This year's deficit resulted from the landslide which cost
the canal about 15 mln dlrs, McAuliffe said. This included
eight to nine mln dlrs in immediate costs with the rest being
spent on earth-moving operations to prevent any further
landslides.
    He said the landslide was not caused by deforestation and
he described as grossly exaggerated reports that there was any
threat to the canal's water supply in the foreseeable future.
    Studies concerning the possibility of widening the Gaillard
cut would not be affected by the landslide, he said, adding
that he expected the canal board to determine whether and when
the canal needed widening by January 1988 at the latest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7500>
A U.S. Navy battle group led by the
U.S. aircraft carrier Kitty Hawk is in the northern Arabian Sea
amid renewed concern about the safety of shipping off the coast
of Iran, U.S. officials said today.
    But Pentagon spokesman Fred Hoffmann said that reports the
naval strike force was in the region did not mean the United
States was sending a new warning to Iran against escalating
attacks on shipping in the Persian Gulf.
    "Nothing like that has happened," he said. "No signal is being
sent."
    He said that the Kitty Hawk is operating in an area where
it usually does. "It's normal. It's in the waters where it's
supposed to be. It's been there for over a month."
    The Kitty Hawk and its force of warplanes is the mainstay
of the U.S. Indian Ocean Battle Group which patrols a vast area
extending from the Indian subcontinent through the Arabian Sea.
    With the Kitty Hawk and its group in the Arabian Sea to the
south and the U.S. Mideast Task Force in the Persian Gulf to
the north, the United States has 10 warships on either end of
the strategic Straits of Hormuz.
    The Pentagon, as is its custom, declined to confirm the
exact whereabouts of the ships or what they were up to.
    State Department officials cited concern about the safety
of ships passing through the Straits on the vital oil supply
run to the Gulf.
    Iran has conducted repeated attacks on shipping in the Gulf
and U.S. officials have said that Teheran has recently equipped
itself with powerful Chinese and Italian-made anti-ship
missiles, posing a greater threat.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7534>
The Chinese port of Ningbo is
working well below capacity despite being only 130 miles from
Shanghai, which is seriously congested, a port official said.
    Jiang Feng Xiang said the port -- the deepest in China --
handled 17.95 mln tonnes of cargo last year, up from 10.44 mln
in 1985, but well below its potential capacity of 32 mln
tonnes. Shanghai handled 100 mln tonnes of cargo in 1986.
    Jiang said Ningbo is under-utilised because of its
inadequate facilities, including a single track rail line
linking it to Hangzhou, where it joins the national network.
    Ningbo handles crude oil exports and transhipments of coal
from north to south China and imports include fertiliser and
soda ash and iron ore from Brazil and Australia. The docks can
handle ships of up to 150,000 tonnes and oil tankers of up to
200,000 tonnes can load and unload in the harbour.
    Most of Ningbo's port infrastructure has been built since
1979, official publications show. A container berth and two
timber and three general cargo berths will be added during the
current 1986-90 five-year plan, Jiang said.
    "The rail line to Hangzhou will be double tracked by 1995.
By 2000, maybe, we will overtake Shanghai," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7642>
Strong south-easterly winds were
keeping many vessels trapped in the ice off the Finnish and
Swedish coasts in one of the worst icy periods in the Baltic
for many years, the Finnish Board of Navigation said.
    In Finland and Sweden up to 50 vessels were reported to be
stuck in the ice, and even the largest of the assisting
icebreakers were having difficulties in breaking through to the
stranded ships, coastguard officials said.
    However, icy conditions in the southern Baltic at the
Soviet oil ports of Ventspils and Klaipeda had eased, they said.
    Weather officials in neighbouring Sweden said the icy
conditions in the Baltic were the worst for 30 years, with
ships fighting a losing battle to keep moving.
    In the coastal stretches of the Gulf of Bothnia, which
divides Finland and Sweden, the ice is up to one metre thick,
with drifts and currents packing it into almost impenetrable
walls three metres high, Swedish coastguard officials said.
    Weather forecasts say winds may ease during the weekend but
a further drop in temperature could bring shipping to a
standstill, the officials said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7792>
The Agriculture Department is not
considering any major changes in its pricing system for posted
county prices, an Agriculture Department offical said.
    "We do not have current plans to make any major adjustments
or changes in our pricing," said Bob Sindt, USDA assistant
deputy administrator for commodity operations.
    U.S. grain traders and merchandisers said earlier this week
USDA might act soon to reduce the cash corn price premium at
the Gulf versus interior price levels by dropping ASCS posted
prices to encourage interior PIK and roll movement.
    But Sindt denied USDA is planning any such changes.
    "If people are suggesting that we are going to make
wholesale changes in pricing, we are not considering this," he
said.
    Sindt, however, did not rule out the possiblity of
implementing more minor changes in its pricing system.
    "We are continually monitoring the whole nationwide
structure to maintain its accuracy," he said. "If we become
convinced that we need to make a change, then appropriate
adjustments will be made."
    Sindt acknowledged that concern has been voiced that USDA's
price differentials between the New Orleans Gulf and interior
markets are not accurate because of higher than normal barge
freight rates.
    He said commodity operations deputy administrator Ralph
Klopfenstein is currently in the midwest on a speaking tour and
will meet with ASCS oficials in Kansas City next week.
    Sindt said a number of issues will be discussed at that
meeting, including the current concern over the gulf corn
premiums.
    He defended the USDA differentials, saying that these price
margins reflect an average of prices throughout the year and
that seasonal factors will normally cause prices to increase or
decrease.
    The USDA official also said that only those counties that
use the Gulf to price grain are being currently affected by the
high barge freight tariffs and increased gulf prices.
    When asked if the USDA emergency storage program which
allows grain to be stored in barges was taking up barge space
and accounting for the higher freight rates, Sindt discounted
the idea.
    He said USDA has grain left in only about 250 barges and
that, under provisions of the program, these all have to be
emptied by the end of March.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7959>
Regency Cruises Inc said it agreed to
sell a 40 pct interest in the corporation that owns the M/V
Regent Sea cruise ship for 2.1 mln dlrs to Monmouth
International SA, which owns the other 60 pct.
    The company said it also extended a 1.7 mln dlr secured
loan to Monmouth to finance completion of the renovation of
another vessel, the M/V Regent Star, which is scheduled to
begin operating in late June.
    Regency Cruises, which operates both ships, received a
five-year extension, to November 1995, to the Regent Sea's
original charter agreement, it said. It also received a
reduction, to 600,000 dlrs from 1.6 mln dlrs, of its total
charter guarantee for the Regent Sea and Regent Star.
    Regency also reported 1986 earnings of 5,695,000 dlrs or 37
cts a share on revenues of 40.9 mln dlrs. It began operations
in November 1985.
    In addition, the company said its bank, Irving Bank Corp
&lt;V>, agreed to waive a one mln dlr counter guarantee for the
bank to provide a 2.6 mln dlrs guarantee for Regency's Federal
Maritime Commission bond.
    The company said after April 3 the exercise price of its
warrants will return to two dlrs until they expire April 21.
The price had been reduced to 1.50 dlrs for the three weeks
ending April 3.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7961>
the U.S. Agriculture Department is
proposing to permit coverage of freight cost and marine and war
risk insurance for sales  of all agricultural commodities sold
on credit terms under the Commodity Credit Corporation's, CCC,
credit guarantee programs.
    The proposal only applies to commodities that are sold by
exporters on a cost and freight, C and F, or cost, insurance
and freight, CIF, basis, since these costs would be included in
the exporter's sale price to the foreign buyer, it said.
    Under current programs, freight costs can be covered only
for export sales of U.S. breeding animals.
    It asked for comments on the proposal by April 20.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8009>
The St. Lawrence Seaway, set
to reopen March 31 after the winter, faces another tough year
because of depressed traffic levels and the possibility of the
first strike in 20 years on the Great Lakes, seaway officials
said.
    Depressed grain exports, rising costs, and competing modes
of transportation are all expected to result in only a marginal
increase over last year's traffic levels -- and revenues -- on
the 2,300 mile waterway, officials said.
    In 1986, a season that ran from April 3 to December 27, the
seaway moved 37.6 mln metric tons of freight between Montreal
and Lake Ontario and 41.6 mln tons on the Welland Canal,
linking Lake Erie and Lake Ontario.
    By comparison, in 1985 about 37 mln tons of cargo traveled
through the Montreal-Lake Ontario section and 42 mln through
the eight-lock canal.
    The waterway is expected to lose 9-10 mln Canadian dlrs
this year, about the same as the estimated deficit for fiscal
1986-87 ending March 31, said William Blair, an executive
member of Canada's St Lawrence Seaway Authority.
    The seaway moves about one-half of Canada's exported grain.
Those exports of the single most important commodity carried on
the waterway have been depressed by world surpluses.
    The Seafarers' International Union, which represents about
2,300 workers on the Great Lakes and the ocean coasts, has said
it will likely go on strike this spring to protest employers'
demands for wage rollbacks and other concessions.
    "It's 99.9 pct (certain)--I guarantee you a strike," Roman
Gralewicz, head of the Seafarers' Canadian branch, has said.
    The Canadian government has called in a labor conciliator
to try to hammer out a contract agreement between the two
sides. The seaway authority said a walkout tying up ships on
the Great Lakes would badly hurt traffic.
    "We haven't had a strike on the seaway for years...a
prolonged strike would have a disasterous effect," Seaway
Authority spokeswoman Gay Hemsley said.
    "These are the heaviest contract talks in the history of the
St Lawrence Seaway," George Miller, vice-president of the
Canadian Lake Carriers Association, an association of major
Canadian shipping companies, said recently.
    The workers' current contract expires May 31. The
association said it is asking for a five per cent cut in wages
for the next three years, reduced crew levels and the power to
restructure crew dispatching.
    The association said its members recorded about a 6 mln dlrs
(U.S.) loss in each of 1985 and 1986 due to lower traffic and
freight rates and increasing competition. The seaway said 1985
was its worst year in two decades.
    Hemsley said the seaway authority plans to raise tolls on
the Welland Canal by eight pct this year, compared to last
year's 15 pct rise, while maintaining a freeze on tolls
throughout the rest of the waterway.
    Canada is responsible for 13 of the seaway's 15 locks and
about 85 pct of its revenues and maintenance costs.
    "We may see and hope for a steady upward climb...but we
won't see a major increase for a number of years," Hemsley said.
    A Canada-U.S. delegation to promote the seaway to shippers
in Western Europe should result in some increased traffic this
season but the full benefits won't be felt for several years,
Blair said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8109>
Iran said reports that it intended to
threaten shipping in the Gulf were baseless, and warned the
U.S. And other countries not to interfere in the region.
    Tehran radio, monitored by the BBC, quoted a Foreign
Ministry spokesman as saying any attempt at interference would
be met by "a strong response from Iran and other Moslems in the
world."
     U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger, in remarks
apparently unrelated to the broadcast, said the U.S. Would do
whatever was necessary to keep shipping lanes open in the face
of new Iranian anti-ship missiles in the Gulf.
    The U.S. State Department said two days ago Tehran had been
told of U.S. Concern that Iranian anti-ship missiles posed a
threat to the free flow of oil from the Gulf.
    U.S. Officials have said Iran has new Chinese-made
anti-ship "Silkworm" missiles, which pose a greater threat to
merchant ships than missiles used before.
    The Iranian spokesman said the reports that Iran intended
to attack ships were "misleading propaganda."
    He said Iraq's President Saddam Hussein was the main cause
of tension in the Gulf and said Iran would continue to use "all
its legitimate means to stem the cause of tension."
    Weinberger said in a television interview in the U.S. "We
are fully prepared to do what's necessary to keep the shipping
going and keep the freedom of navigation available in that very
vital waterway."
    "We aren't going into any disclosures or discussions of what
might happen, but we are certainly very sympathetic to and
listening carefully to any suggestions for our assistance in
keeping navigation free in that area," he said.
    Weinberger said U.S warship movements in the Gulf area were
not unusual.
    A U.S. Navy battle group led by the aircraft carrier Kitty
Hawk is currently in the northern Arabian Sea.
    The Iranian spokesman was quoted by Tehran radio as saying
the U.S. Was trying to build up its military presence in the
region.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8159>
The Indian State Trading Corporation
(STC) bought four cargoes of rbd palm olein totalling 24,000
tonnes at its vegetable oil import tender last week, traders
said. Market reports on Friday said the STC had booked two
cargoes.
    The business comprised three 6,000 tonne cargoes for June
at 346 dlrs and 6,000 tonnes for July at 340 dlrs per tonne
cif.
    It also secured a 20,000 tonne cargo of optional origin
rapeseed oil for May 15/Jun 15 shipment at 321 dlrs cif.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8188>
Iran said reports that it intended to
threaten shipping in the Gulf were baseless, and warned the
U.S. And other countries not to interfere in the region.
    Tehran radio, monitored by the BBC, quoted a Foreign
Ministry spokesman as saying any attempt at interference would
be met by "a strong response from Iran and other Moslems in the
world."
     U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger, in remarks
apparently unrelated to the broadcast, said the U.S. Would do
whatever was necessary to keep shipping lanes open in the face
of new Iranian anti-ship missiles in the Gulf.
    The U.S. State Department said two days ago Tehran had been
told of U.S. Concern that Iranian anti-ship missiles posed a
threat to the free flow of oil from the Gulf.
    U.S. Officials have said Iran has new Chinese-made
anti-ship "Silkworm" missiles, which pose a greater threat to
merchant ships than missiles used before.
    The Iranian spokesman said the reports that Iran intended
to attack ships were "misleading propaganda."
    He said Iraq's President Saddam Hussein was the main cause
of tension in the Gulf and said Iran would continue to use "all
its legitimate means to stem the cause of tension."
    Weinberger said in a television interview in the U.S. "We
are fully prepared to do what's necessary to keep the shipping
going and keep the freedom of navigation available in that very
vital waterway."
    "We aren't going into any disclosures or discussions of what
might happen, but we are certainly very sympathetic to and
listening carefully to any suggestions for our assistance in
keeping navigation free in that area," he said.
    Weinberger said U.S warship movements in the Gulf area were
not unusual.
    A U.S. Navy battle group led by the aircraft carrier Kitty
Hawk is currently in the northern Arabian Sea.
    The Iranian spokesman was quoted by Tehran radio as saying
the U.S. Was trying to build up its military presence in the
region.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8197>
The Iranian steam tanker Avaj, 316,379
tonnes dw, was attacked and hit at 1715 hours on March 21,
Lloyds Shipping Intelligence service reported.
    One person was killed. The tanker is owned by the National
Iranian Tanker Co.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8200>
Uganda's state-run Coffee Marketing
Board (CMB) has been suffering a cash crisis for the past two
months due to a bottleneck in export shipments and
administrative delays in handling payments, trade sources said.
    The CMB needs between 10 and 15 billion shillings (the
equivalent of seven to 10 mln dlrs) to pay farmers and
processors for coffee already delivered, but its present export
revenue is insufficient to cover such expenditure, they said.
    The board's cash crisis has serious implications for the
economy as a whole, since coffee accounts for 95 pct of
Uganda's total exports.
    The CMB's financial difficulties first started in January
following delays in rail-freighting export consignments of
coffee to the ports of Mombasa, Dar es Salaam and Tanga.
    These delays were caused by a shortage of railway wagons in
Uganda and bottlenecks on the ferries which transport Ugandan
wagons across Lake Victoria to link up with the Kenyan and
Tanzanian railway systems, the sources said
    Marketing Minister John Sebaana-Kizito publicly
acknowledged on February 19 that the CMB had run up arrears to
local suppliers as a result of the shortage of transport for
moving exports.
    Sebaana-Kizito said at the time that the payments squeeze
would be resolved in two weeks.
    However, an accident to the rail ferry which plies between
the Ugandan lake port of Jinja and Kisumu in Kenya put it out
of action between February 21 and March 15, causing fresh
delays in cargo movements.
    Coffee exports are especially sensitive to the disruption
of rail transport since president Yoweri Museveni has banned
their haulage by road in a drive to save transport costs.
    Transport difficulties meant that by early February the CMB
was holding unsold coffee stocks of around 750,000 bags.
    These stocks were equivalent to one quarter of Uganda's
expected three mln 60-kilo bag 1986/87 (October-September)
crop, the sources said.
    According to the sources, the board's financial problems
have been aggravated by long delays in processing export
receipts.
    The coffee board was taking about eight weeks to recycle
export receipts into payments to local producers, whereas
export bills handled by local banks took half that time to
process, they said.
    The sources said the CMB's price structure had been
overtaken by Uganda's high inflation rate, unofficially
estimated at about 200 pct, and that this was a further
disincentive to producers, already owed large arrears.
    "The coffee pricing structure is wrong and three months
behind, the foreign exchange rate is unrealistic, and the
sooner the so-called economic package is put in top gear, the
better for the coffee industry and the economy as a whole," one
of the sources said.
    The government is currently negotiating a package of
economic reforms with the World Bank and International Monetary
Fund aimed at underpinning a renewed inflow of foreign aid to
help Uganda's economic recovery after 15 years of political
strife.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8214>
New Zealand ports reopened at 0730
hrs local time (1930 GMT March 22) after being closed since
March 19 because of a strike over pay claims by watersiders, a
Waterside Federation spokesman said.
    But industrial action by other port workers is likely to
cause further disruption, Harbour Workers union secretary Ross
Wilson told Reuters.
    Wilson said his members are holding stopwork meetings this
morning to consider further stoppages over their pay claim.
    The two disputes are not related.
    Harbour Workers around the country went on strike for 24
hours on March 16, but Wilson said any further action will
occur on a port-by-port basis.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8246>
The West German-registered motor
vessel Stefan E. Sank off the West African coast early today
and one of its eight crew members was killed, a Spanish navy
spokesman said.
    He said the captain of the Singapore-registered tanker Nord
Pacific reported in a radio message that he had picked up the
remaining seven crewmen of the 2,223 tonnes dw Stefan E.,
Together with the body of the dead man.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8319>
Graan Elevator Mij (GEM) said its
balance in port of grains, oilseeds and derivatives rose to
70,000 tonnes on March 21 compared with 10,000 a week earlier
after arrivals of 192,000 tonnes and discharges of 132,000
tonnes last week.
    The balance comprised 25,000 tonnes of grains plus oilseeds
and 45,000 tonnes of derivatives.
    This week's estimated arrivals total 487,000 tonnes, of
which 107,000 are grains/oilseeds and 380,000 derivatives.
    The figures cover around 95 pct of Rotterdam traffic in the
products concerned.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8421>
The United States has offered Navy
warships to escort Kuwaiti oil tankers into and out of the 
Gulf where they could be threatened by new Iranian anti-ship
missiles, U.S. defense officials said today.
    "We believe the Kuwaitis have also approached the Soviet
Union about the possibility of using Soviet tankers" to ship
their oil, one of the officials told Reuters. "But if there is
superpower protection, we would rather it come from us," the
official said.
    The officials, who asked not to be identified, said Kuwait
had asked about possible protection for a dozen vessels, most
of them oil tankers, which could be supplied by three U.S. Navy
guided missile destroyers and two guided missile frigates now
in the southern part of the Gulf.
    "We told them we would give them help and we are waiting to
hear the Kuwaiti response to our offer," one official said.
    In addition to a half dozen ships in the U.S. Navy's small
Mideast Task Force near the Straits of Hormuz, the Pentagon has
moved 18 warships -- including the Aircraft Carrier Kitty Hawk
-- into the northern Indian Ocean in the past month.
    White House and defense officials said today that massing
of the fleet was routine and had nothing to do with the
Iran-Iraq war or Iran's recent stationing of Chinese-made 
anti-ship missiles near the mouth of the Gulf.
    The land-based missiles have increased concern in Kuwait
and other Middle East countries that their oil shipments might
be affected. Several hundred vessels have been confirmed hit in
the  Gulf by Iran and Iraq since early 1984. White House
spokesman Marlin Fitzwater told reporters today that it was in
the U.S. strategic interest to keep the free flow of oil in the
gulf and through the Straits of Hormuz.
    But he said U.S. ships in the region were on routine
maneuvers.
    Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger on Sunday declined to
discuss specifics, but said the United States would do whatever
was necessary to keep the Gulf shipping open in the face of new
Iranian anti-ship missiles in the region.
    "We are fully prepared to do what's necessary to keep the
shipping going and keep the freedom of navigation available in
that very vital waterway of the world," he said on NBC
television's "Meet the Press."
    The State Department said Friday Iran has been informed
about U.S. concern over the threat to oil shipments in the
Gulf. The communciation was sent through Switzerland, which
represents American interests in Iran.
     Iran on Sunday denied as baseless reports that it intended
to threaten shipping in the gulf and warned the United States
that any interference in the region would meet a strong
response from Tehran, Tehran Radio said.
    An Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesman, quoted in a
broadcast monitored by the BBC in London, said reports that
Iran intends to threaten shipping in the Gulf were baseless.
    "In conjunction with this misleading propaganda, America has
already paved the ground to achieve its expansionist and
hegemonistic intentions, aiming to build up its military
presence in the region," he was quoted as saying.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8440>
Iraq said today its warplnes had
attacked a supertanker and four Iranian oil sites and vowed to
keep up such raids until the Gulf war ends.
    The surprise escalation of attacks on oil installations
broke more than a month-long lull in Iraqi air force action.
    It also followed celebrations yesterday of what Baghdad
hailed as Iran's failure to achieve victory during the Iranian
year which ended on Saturday.
    A high command communique said warplanes hit the western
jetty at Iran's Kharg island oil terminal in the afternoon and
struck a supertanker nearby at the same time.
    The Kharg terminal, attacked about 135 times since August
1985, was last raided in January.
    The communique did not identify the supertanker, but said
columns of smoke were seen billowing from it.
    In London, Lloyds insurance said the 162,046-ton Iranian
tanker Avaj was hit on Saturday, when Iraq reported an earlier
Gulf attack.
    But there has been no independent confirmation of today's
supertanker attack nor of other raids on shipping reported by
Baghdad in the past 24 hours.
    The last confirmed Iraqi attack took place on March eight,
when the Iranian tanker Khark-5 was hit south of Kharg.
    Iraqi warplanes also struck Iran's offshore oilfields at
Nowruz, Cyrus and Ardeshir in northern gulf, some 80 km (50
miles) west of Kharg island, today's communique said.
    The three oilfields have been raided several times in the
past three years. Oil sources said they were not crucially
important to Iran's oil export trade.
    A second high command communique today said Iraqi warplanes
flew 94 sorties against Iranan targets and positions at the war
front.
    It also reported a clash between Iraqi naval units and
several Iranian boats carrying men to attack an Iraqi oil
terminal at the northen tip of the Gulf.
    Two Iranian boats wer destroyed and sunk with their
occupants and the others fled, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8516>
Iraq said its warplanes had attacked a
supertanker and four Iranian oil sites and vowed to keep up
such raids until the Gulf war ends.
    The surprise escalation of attacks on oil installations
broke more than a month-long lull in Iraqi air force action.
    It also followed celebrations yesterday of what Baghdad
hailed as Iran's failure to achieve victory during the Iranian
year which ended on Saturday.
    A high command communique said warplanes hit the western
jetty at Iran's Kharg island oil terminal in the afternoon and
struck a supertanker nearby at the same time.
    The Kharg terminal, attacked about 135 times since August
1985, was last raided in January.
    The communique did not identify the supertanker, but said
columns of smoke were seen billowing from it.
    In London, Lloyds insurance said the 162,046-ton Iranian
tanker Avaj was hit on Saturday, when Iraq reported an earlier
Gulf attack.
    But there has been no independent confirmation of today's
supertanker attack nor of other raids on shipping reported by
Baghdad in the past 24 hours.
    The last confirmed Iraqi attack took place on March 8, when
the Iranian tanker Khark-5 was hit south of Kharg.
    Iraqi warplanes also struck Iran's offshore oilfields at
Nowruz, Cyrus and Ardeshir in northern gulf, some 80 km (50
miles) west of Kharg island, today's communique said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8675>
The U.S. Has offered warships to
escort Kuwaiti tankers in the Gulf past Iranian anti-ship
missile batteries, Defence Department officials said.
    The officials told Reuters yesterday the offer was made
last week by Navy Admiral William Crowe, chairman of the
Pentagon Joint Chiefs of Staff, during a Middle East visit.
    Reagan administration officials said later that Washington
did not seek military confrontation with Tehran, but would not
let Iran use Chinese-made "Silkworm" anti-ship missiles, capable
of covering the narrow entrance to the Gulf, to choke oil
shipments to the West.
    Defence officials said Kuwait had asked if protection for
up to a dozen vessels, most of them tankers, could be provided
by three U.S. Navy destroyers and two frigates now in the
southern Gulf and the Gulf of Oman.
    In addition to a half dozen ships in the U.S. Navy's small
Mideast Task Force near the Straits of Hormuz, the Pentagon has
moved 18 warships, including the aircraft carrier Kitty Hawk,
into the northern Arabian Sea in the past month.
    White House and defence officials said that massing the
fleet was routine and had nothing to do with the Iran-Iraq war
or Iran's stationing of missiles near the mouth of the Gulf.
    The State Department said on Friday that Iran has been told
about U.S. Concern over the threat to oil shipments in the
Gulf. The communication was sent through Switzerland, which
represents U.S. Interests in Iran.
    Iran denied as baseless reports that it intended to
threaten shipping in the Gulf and said any U.S. Interference in
the region would meet a strong response, Tehran Radio said on
Sunday.
    Several hundred vessels have been confirmed hit in the Gulf
by Iran and Iraq since early 1984 in the so-called tanker war,
an offshoot of their 6-1/2-year-old ground conflict.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8688>
Iran has test-fired its newly acquired
Silkworm anti-shipping missile in the Strait of Hormuz and has
set up at least two land-based launching sites in the area, a
British naval source in the Gulf said.
    The source, who declined to be identified, said Iran had
fired the Chinese-made missile at a hulk off its southern Gulf
naval port of Bandar Abbas and scored a hit.
    "These missiles pack a fairly big punch," he told Reuters.
"There is no doubt they could be used to target (shipping)
across the Strait of Hormuz."
    Tension in the Gulf has risen since U.S. Officials last
week broke the news that Iran had acquired the Silkworm
missiles.
    The U.S. Has said it will not allow Iran to use the
missiles to choke off oil shipments and has offered its
warships to escort Kuwaiti tankers past the missile batteries.
    But Tehran denied last Sunday it intended to threaten Gulf
shipping and warned the U.S. Any interference in the region
would meet a strong response.
    The British naval source said the Silkworms were in place
at at least two sites around the Strait of Hormuz, but would
not give the exact location.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8696>
Iran has test-fired its newly acquired
Silkworm anti-shipping missile in the Strait of Hormuz and has
set up at least two land-based launching sites in the area, a
British naval source in the Gulf said.
    The source, who declined to be identified, said Iran had
fired the Chinese-made missile at a hulk off its southern Gulf
naval port of Bandar Abbas and scored a hit.
    "These missiles pack a fairly big punch," he told Reuters.
"There is no doubt they could be used to target (shipping)
across the Strait of Hormuz."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8744>
Honduras will tender March 26 under
PL480 for U.S. and non-U.S. flag vessels to import 1,500 tonnes
of tallow in bulk, an agent for the country said.
    The agent said delivery includes laydays of April 5-15.
    Offers are due by 1200 hrs EST, March 26, and will remain
valid until the close of business the following day, the agent
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8749>
The speaker of the Iranian Parliament,
Hojatoleslam Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani, warned the U.S. Not to
intervene in the Gulf, a day after Washington said its warships
were available to escort Kuwaiti tankers through the waterway.
    "If U.S. Intervention occurs, the entire world will become
insecure for the Americans and the events of Lebanon could be
repeated for the Americans everywhere," he said.
    U.S. Defence officials disclosed in Washington yesterday
that the U.S. Navy, which has about 24 warships in or near the
Gulf, was prepared to escort Kuwaiti tankers, regular targets
for Iranian attacks in an offshoot of its war with Iraq.
    Rafsanjani, in an interview reported by the Iranian news
agency IRNA, also commented on earlier U.S. Disclosures that
Iran had erected sites for new Chinese-made Silkworm
anti-shipping missiles at the Strait of Hormuz.
    The agency, received in London, quoted him as saying that
Iran did not need missiles to close the strait, 24 miles wide
at its narrowest, because "we can close it with artillery only."
    He added "We have the longest coasts and the highest
interest here and the small southern (Gulf) states have a
lesser interest compared with us and therefore it is natural
for us to protect the security of the Strait of Hormuz more
than others."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8795>
Moore McCormack Resources Inc
said it has completed the previously-announced sale of its
Interlake Steamship Co and Moore McCormack Bulk Transport Inc
Great Lakes and ocean bulk shipping units to James R. Barker.
    The company said president Paul Tregurtha has succeeded
Barker as chairman and chief executive officer of Moore
McCormack.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8856>
The Soviet Union supports the freedom
of navigation in the Gulf and does not support any act which
would cause the deterioration of the situation in the region,
its ambassador to Kuwait, Ernest Zverev, told the Kuwaiti news
agency KUNA.
    "We support the freedom of navigation in the Arabian Gulf
and the Strait of Hormuz," the agency quoted Zverev as saying.
    KUNA also said the envoy had discussed the deployment of
Iranian missiles near the Strait of Hormuz with Kuwaiti Foreign
Undersecretary Suliman Majed al-Shaheen.
    A British naval source in the Gulf said today Iran had
test-fired its new Silkworm missiles and set up launching sites
in the area.
    The tests had been successful and the missiles could be
used against shipping in the strait, the source added.
    But Iranian Parliamentary Speaker Hojatoleslam Akbar
Hashemi Rafsanjani said Iran did not need missiles to close the
strait because "we can close it with artillery only."
    The U.S. Has said it will not allow Iran to use missiles to
choke off oil shipments and offered its warships to escort
Kuwaiti tankers past the missile batteries in the strait.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8902>
Standard Chartered Plc &lt;STCH.L>, faced
with a recession in the key Singapore and Malaysian markets and
an ongoing depression in the shipping industry, boosted its
bad-debt provisions in 1986, chairman Lord Barber said.
    Barber said in a statement on the bank's 1986 results that
bad and doubtful debt provisions, both general and specific,
stood at 545.6 mln stg against 416.6 mln at end-1985.
    Bank figures showed the increase was almost exclusively in
the specific bad risk provision, which qualifies for U.K. Tax
breaks. New specific provisions rose by 111.5 mln stg while
71.2 mln stg were reallocated from the general risk provision.
    In all, a 184.2 mln stg charge was made against profits for
1986, compared with a 100.7 mln stg charge in 1985. Total
pre-tax profits fell to 254 mln after 268 mln in 1985.
    "The continuing serious recessionary conditions in Singapore
and Malaysia and the depressed condition of the shipping
industry made it necessary to provide heavily against bad and
doubtful debs arising from loans in the Asia Pacific region, on
top of the normal level of provisioning," Barber said.
    He said, "the decision was also taken to build up loan loss
reeserves by making a sizeable increase in the charges for
general provisions for commercial and cross border risks."
    Barber said due to bad-debt provisioning, the Asia Pacific
region made "a negligible contribution to pre-tax profits."
    He said the profits contribution from the U.K. Businesses
was "well maintained, although the reported result was affected
by cross border debt provisioning," while Californian subsidiary
Union Bank "showed continued growth."
    "Tropical Africa, Middle East and South Asia all turned in
excellent performances and the revival in Europe continued," he
said.
    Barber said the group, which succesfully fought off a
takeover bid by Lloyds Bank &lt;LLOY.L> last year, strengthened
its capital resources during that year to just over three
billion stg, while total assets increased to 32.2 billion.
    Capital adequacy ratios remained strong, with the primary
capital ratio standing at 7.5 pct at end 1986, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8950>
About 14,000 of Brazil's 40,000
seamen are now back at work after pay accords with 21 shipping
companies but the rest are still on strike, a spokesman at
strike headquarters said today.
    The seamen began a national stoppage on February 27.
    The spokesman, talking by telephone from Rio de Janeiro,
said 126 ships were strike-bound.
    He added that because of resignations by many seamen there
were scarcely any crews left on 38 of these ships.
    The seamen have settled in general for pay rises of 120 pct
with the 21 companies. Talks with the shipowners' association
Syndarma have been deadlocked over overtime.
    While exports have been delayed by the strike, exporters
say the problems have been manageable.
    "It hasn't been critical by any means," said a coffee trader
in Santos, who noted that coffee was still moving on foreign
ships.
    Economic analysts added, however, that any delay to exports
served to aggravate Brazil's balance of payments crisis, which
last month prompted the government to suspend interest payments
on 68 billion dlrs of commercial debt.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9314>
About half of Brazil's 40,000 seamen
have returned to work after accords with 22 companies, and the
national strike which began on February 27 looks close to
ending, a union spokesman said.
    The spokesman, speaking from strike headquarters in Rio de
Janeiro, estimated that 80 ships were strike-bound.
    The seamen have settled for 120 pct pay increases with the
individual companies but are still discussing the issue of
overtime payments with the shipowners' association, Syndarma.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9348>
Iranian Prime Minister Mir-Hossein
Mousavi said Iran had "more effective" missiles at its disposal
than the shore-to-sea missiles which had provoked U.S. Concern,
Tehran Radio reported.
    A U.S. State Department spokesman said last week Iran had
acquired Chinese-made Silkworm missiles which posed a greater
threat to shipping in the Gulf than the weapons previously
used.
    Tehran Radio, monitored by the British Broadcasting Corp,
quoted Mousavi as saying that Tehran officially announced after
its forces overran southern Iraq's Faw peninsula in February
last year that it had shore-to-sea missiles.
    "The fact that the Americans, after so much delay, are now
thinking of expressing their concern with panic is because
Reagan needs this sensation now," said Mousavi, speaking after a
cabinet meeting in Tehran.
    "We also announce today that these missiles are not the
limit of our war capabilities in the Gulf," he added.
    Mousavi said the security of the Gulf region had nothing to
do with the U.S. But Iran would resort to any action to defend
the Gulf, "even those actions which are not thought probable by
Westerners."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9356>
Argentine port workers began an
indefinite protest against safety conditions at the port of
Buenos Aires, stopping work for one hour per shift, a press
spokesman said.
    He said three port workers had died over the last month in
accidents. He said the decision to take action was made after a
port worker died yesterday after being electrocuted.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9362>
India is reported to have bought two
white sugar cargoes for April/May shipment at its tender today
near 227 dlrs a tonne cost and freight and could be seeking a
third cargo, traders said.
    A British operator is believed to have sold one of the
cargoes, while an Austrian concern is thought to have featured
in the second cargo sale, they said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9473>
The Liberian motor bulk carrier, Trave
Ore, 106,490 dwt, loaded with ore, and the 2,852 dwt West
German motor vessel Christa, collided late last night on the
River Elbe near buoy 129, Lloyds Shipping Intelligence said.
    The Trave Ore proceeded by its own means to Hamburg. The
Christa was taken in tow with a damaged bow.
    The Liberian vessel was concluding a trip from Seven
Islands to Hamburg.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9479>
Brazil's labour unrest is spreading,
with many banks, universities and government statistical
offices on strike and more pay disputes looming.
    Bankworkers' leaders said that a national strike launched
yesterday to press for a 100 pct immediate pay rise and monthly
salary adjustments had the support of most of the 700,000
workforce.
    The strike today closed the stock exchanges of Sao Paulo
and Rio de Janeiro.
    For the government the one positive development on the
labour front was the gradual return to work of the nation's
40,000 seamen, who began a national strike on February 27.
    A union spokesman in Rio de Janeiro told Reuters about half
the seamen had returned to work after accords with 22 companies
and that the strike looked close to an end.
    Otherwise the labour scene looked bleak, with the bank
strike posing the most serious problems for Brazil's
crisis-laden economy.
    "If this goes on for more than a few days it will have a
serious effect because normal financial operations will grind
to a halt," said a western diplomat in Sao Paulo.
    Today Brazil's 50,000 university teachers in the 42 federal
universities launched a national strike, with a broad political
demand as well as a pay claim.
    David Fleischer, head of the political science department
in Brasilia university, told Reuters the National Association
of Higher Education Teachers wanted a full congressional
inquiry into what had happened to government education funds.
    He said the universities were strapped for cash and that
the association suspected the junior partner in the coalition
government, the Liberal Front Party, PFL, of using education
funds for projects which had helped their candidates in
elections. The PFL holds the Education Ministry.
    Hardly any sectors of the economy are proving immune to the
current labour unrest, caused by the return of high inflation,
officially pegged at 33 pct for January-February.
    Other possible strikes looming include stoppages by oil
industry workers and social security workers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9604>
Normal work has resumed at New
Zealand ports as negotiations between harbour board workers and
employers continue.
    Wellington Harbour Board Workers' Union secretary Ross
Wilson told reporters talks late yesterday ended with agreement
to take unresolved issues before an industrial conciliator.
    Wilson said the only remaining issue is the length of the
union award. The dispute originally was about wage rates and
the form of industry negotiations.
    Cook Strait ferry sailings resumed after Marlborough
Harbour Board workers returned to work this morning, ending
their industrial action a day early.
    The Waterside Workers' Federation, which struck for most of
last week and held more than one mln tonnes of shipping in
ports, meets on Monday and Tuesday in conciliation with the
Waterfront Employers' Association.
    Union Secretary Sam Jennings said: "We've got two days of
talks. If it's not all cleaned up by then ... I don't know what
will happen."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9718>
No action has been taken yet
on the Reagan Adminstration's offer to escort Kuwaiti oil
tankers through the Gulf, but the issue is being discussed,
U.S. Secretary of Defence Caspar Weinberger said.
    The offer was made to Kuwait in light of Iran's deployment
of Chinese-built missiles to cover the entrance to the Gulf.
    Weinberger told reporters prior to a speech at Texas
Christian University that he did not think Iran and the United
States were moving towards a potential conflict, adding that
the Straits of Hormuz at the mouth of the Gulf were still "free
water."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9801>
No action has been taken yet
on the Reagan Adminstration's offer to escort Kuwaiti oil
tankers through the Gulf, but the issue is being discussed,
U.S. Secretary of Defence Caspar Weinberger said.
    The offer was made to Kuwait in light of Iran's deployment
of Chinese-built missiles to cover the entrance to the Gulf.
    Weinberger told reporters prior to a speech at Texas
Christian University that he did not think Iran and the United
States were moving towards a potential conflict, adding that
the Straits of Hormuz at the mouth of the Gulf were still "free
water."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9906>
The St Lawrence Seaway between Lake
Ontario and Montreal is still scheduled to open for the
shipping season on March 31, a Seaway official said.
    The Great Lakes could have been open for traffic earlier
this month due to the mild Winter, but scheduled repairs to the
Welland Canal joining Lake Erie with Lake Ontario will keep
that section closed until the April 1 opening, she said.
    One lock system in the four-lock Soo Canal joining Lake
Superior with Huron was opened on the morning of March 22, but
only three commercial vessels have been locked through so far,
according to an U.S. Army Corps of Engineers official.
    The Soo Canal is currently only open for daylight vessel
movement, with 24 hour movement allowed beginning March 29, she
added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
